English
Arabic
Azerbaijani
Catalan
Chinese - Simplified
Chinese - Traditional
Croatian
Czech
Dutch
French
German
Greek
Hungarian
Indonesian
Italian
Japanese
Malaysian
Polish
Portuguese (Portugal)
Romanian
Russian
Spanish
Thai
Vietnamese
English
Loading...
UNITY™ BY HARD ROCK PRIVACY POLICY
Last Update: August 23, 2024
INTRODUCTION
1. This Privacy Policy is administered by Seminole Hard Rock Support Services, LLC, d/b/a HR Unity Global Services, 5701 Stirling Road, Davie, Florida 33314, United States of America (the “
Program Manager
”) on behalf of Hard Rock Affiliated Parties.
2. This Privacy Policy applies and governs when you:
access or use the Unity Program Website (the “
Program Website
”) at
unity.hardrock.com
;
download, access, or use the mobile application made available by us in connection with the Program; or
use our products or services in relation to, or in connection with, the Program.
3. This Privacy Policy explains how we may collect, use and share (collectively, “
Process
”) your Personal Information in relation to, and in connection with, the Unity by Hard Rock loyalty program, which is also known as Unity™ or as Unity by Seminole Gaming™ (collectively, the “
Program
”).
4. This Privacy Policy also provides information about your rights with respect to your Personal Information and how you can contact us if you have any concern or questions about your Personal Information.
5. The Program Manager is the data controller of your Personal Information under the Program. This means, in relation to the Program, that the Program Manager has overall say and control over the reason and purposes behind the collection of your Personal Information and the means and method of any processing of your Personal Information.
6. When you visit the Program Website, use the Unity App, use any product, service, or benefit of the Program, or interact with us, and provide your Personal Information to us, your Personal Information will be processed in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
7. You acknowledge that we shall, in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Policy, use any Personal Information already held or obtained in connection with, or as a result of, you being a member of, or participating in, a pre-existing rewards or loyalty program, including, without limitation, any one or more of the following rewards or loyalty programs: (i) Seminole Wild Card; (ii) Hard Rock Rewards; (iii) Wild Card Rewards; or (iv) Hard Rock Casino Northern Indiana Loyalty Program.
8. We may collect certain Personal Information about you to provide you with the services, features and benefits of the Program and also to facilitate our relationship with you in connection with the Program. Providing Personal Information is optional. You may choose not to provide the requested Personal Information; however, you may not be able to access and use some or all of the features or benefits of the Program for which your Personal Information is required.
9. We may update this Privacy Policy at any time, and any updates to this Privacy Policy will be effective on the date specified in the updated Privacy Policy.
10. Where additional detailed information is needed to explain our privacy practices, we will provide such information in supplementary privacy notices.
11. This Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected by any third party, including, but not limited to, a third-party website, third-party applications, or third-party advertising that may link to or be accessible from or on the Program Website or the Unity App. Please review the privacy policies of any third-party website or application for more information about how they process your Personal Information.
12. This Privacy Policy is provided in a layered format so you can click through to the specific sections of this Privacy Policy. Alternatively, you may view and/or download a Portable Document Format (.pdf) version of this Privacy Policy
here
.
Definitions
13. In this Privacy Policy, the following words shall have the following meanings:
"Account"
means an account assigned to a Member under the Program for the recording of Tier Credits, Unity Points, and if appropriate, other Program Benefits of that Member, as well as other relevant Member information.
"Account Credentials"
means in relation to a Member: (a) the unique Account number allocated to that Member or their email address; and (b) the password selected by that Member to access their Account.
"Additional Terms"
means the additional terms and conditions, rules, and policies, which apply to the Program, such as those applicable to the earning and redemption of Unity Points, that may be posted on the Program Website at
unity.hardrock.com
.
"Applicable Laws"
means any and all laws, ordinances, constitutions, regulations, statutes, treaties, rules, codes, permits, principles of common law, requirements, and orders adopted, enacted, implemented, promulgated, issued, entered, or deemed applicable by or under the authority of any governmental body having jurisdiction over you, the Program, the Program Manager, or any Hard Rock Affiliated Parties, in any way.
"Approved Identification"
means a valid and unexpired government-issued photo identification (e.g., driver’s license, passport, state identification card, or military identification) or other types of identification that may be accepted by Management in its sole discretion.
"Excluded Purchase"
means any of the following expenditures:
the purchase or redemption of any gift cards issued by any of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties;
Non-Qualifying Stays and bookings at packaged rates or discounted or promotional items that are specifically excluded (or if excluded in part, then the excluded part) from the Program;
the purchase of tickets to Hard Rock entertainment events or live events at Participating Locations unless specifically designated as eligible for Unity Points;
purchases at any location that is not a Participating Location;
purchases at non-participating third-party restaurants, retail stores, or other services, including, but not limited to third-party food delivery services (e.g., DoorDash, Grubhub, Uber Eats, etc.), even if located within a Participating Location;
purchases not paid for directly by the Member (e.g., restaurant charges that are billed to a Member’s room and are paid for by a Member’s employer);
group events (i.e., weddings, meetings, receptions, and group menu-based events);
sales, use or personal federal, state, or local taxes, including, but not limited to, VAT and GST;
gratuities; and
any products or services for which it is illegal or prohibited under any Applicable Laws to issue or redeem Unity Points or other Program Benefits.
crew room rate, at a business, employee or friends and family rate,
"Game Play"
means slot machine, other electronic gaming machine, table game play, online gaming, bingo, poker, keno, race and sports betting, social gaming play, or other gaming activities as may be offered at a Participating Location subject to Applicable Laws.
"Hard Rock Affiliated Parties"
means any entity that is an affiliate of or is controlled by, under the control of, under common control with, or managed by, the Program Manager, as well as any Participating Location, or any franchisee or licensee that is operating a Participating Location. For purposes of this definition, “control”, “controlled by”, “under common control with” means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of such entity, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by agreement, or otherwise.
"Management"
means the management of the Participating Location.
"Marketing Brands"
means the following brands:
Hard Rock®;
Hard Rock Cafe®;
Hard Rock Casino®;
Hard Rock Hotel;
Hard Rock Hotel & Casino®;
Hard Rock Digital®;
Rock Shop®;
Seminole Gaming®;
Reverb®; and
Reverb by Hard Rock®.
and any such other brands, trademarks, or trade names used by any of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties for marketing purposes.
"Member"
means a registered member of the Program.
"Membership"
means your enrollment and participation in the Program in accordance with the Membership Terms.
"Membership Terms"
means the Unity By Hard Rock™ Loyalty Program Terms and Conditions and any Additional Terms and any changes to them.
"Non-Gaming Items"
means non-gaming activities, products, or services, including, but not limited to, hotel, cafe, spa, food and beverage, bar, nightclub, live events, retail shop, offered by a Participating Location.
"Non-Qualifying Stay"
means any stay at a Participating Location that is not a Qualifying Stay and includes, but is not limited to, any stay that is:
booked through: (i) tour operators, (ii) vacation clubs or similar programs, (iii) online channels, or other third party channels (irrespective of rate paid), including, but not limited to, expedia.com, trip.com, hotwire.com, priceline.com, orbitz.com, booking.com, travelocity.com, or (iv) third-party branded booking engines (including but not limited to ReservHotel, Despegar, Tripset) that allow package reservations (e.g., combination of hotel with flight, car rental, etc.);
booked through any “opaque” channel where the Marketing Brand may or may not be known at the time of purchase;
booked at a wholesaler or contracted rate where the Member does not directly pay the Participating Location;
greater than thirty (30) consecutive days whereby the first thirty (30) days are deemed a Qualifying Stay but any additional days beyond thirty (30) consecutive days for a stay would not qualify;
provided on a complimentary basis; or
voucher or third-party award redemptions.
"Participating Location"
means any location, outlet, or website participating in the Program, including, but not limited to, participating Seminole Casinos, Seminole Hard Rock Hotel & Casinos, Hard Rock Casinos, Reverb Hotels, Hard Rock Cafe restaurant locations, and Rock Shops. A current list of Participating Locations is provided on the Program Website.
"Personal Information"
means any information relating to an identified or identifiable individual; an identifiable individual is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or to one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural or social identity of that natural person.
"Privacy Policy"
means this privacy policy and any Changes.
"Program Benefits"
means Tier Credits, Unity Points, together with any other Program benefits described on the Program Website.
"Qualifying Spend"
means any purchase of any product or service at a Participating Location that is eligible to earn Tier Credits and Unity Points as set forth on the Program Website, or at a Participating Location, including Game Play and Non Gaming Items, but not including Excluded Purchases.
"Qualifying Stay"
means a stay at a Participating Location (excluding a Non-Qualifying Stay) booked directly through: (a) a Marketing Brand’s central reservation office, website or mobile application; (b) a Participating Location; or (c) an authorized travel agent; or (d) an approved channel, at: (i) public rates; or (ii) non-public rates (where under the applicable booking contract, the booking is deemed to be eligible to earn Tier Credits and Unity Points on all or part of the booking). For the avoidance of doubt, non-public rates may include discounted rates such as advanced purchase rates, group rates, corporate negotiated rates, and government rates.
"Tier Credits"
means those credits issued to a Member’s Account that are used solely to determine the applicable Unity Tier for a Member each year, and are non redeemable, cannot be converted to cash, or cannot be used towards any purchase.
"Unity App"
means the mobile application made available by the Program Manager in connection with the Program.
"Unity Card"
means an authorized card issued by the Program Manager to the Member under the Program either in physical or digital form (including, without limitation, digital card functionality within the Unity App).
"Unity Points"
means points credited to a Member’s Account as a result of a Qualifying Spend that the Member can, subject to Applicable Laws (and any rules of the relevant Participating Location), redeem for permitted merchandise or services, or towards permitted purchases at a Participating Location.
"Unity Tier"
means a tier of the Program available to a Member (with associated Program Benefits) based on Tier Credits earned by that Member as set forth on the Program Website.
"We", "we", "Our" "our", "Us", or "us"
means the Program Manager.
"You", "you", "Your", or "your"
means you as a Member (or potential Member) of the Program.
14. In this Privacy Policy, a reference to “Section” or “section” is a reference to a Section of this Privacy Policy; and words importing the singular include the plural and vice versa.
WHEN AND HOW DO WE COLLECT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION.
15. We may collect your Personal Information directly from you when you:
access or use the Program Website;
download, access or use the Unity App;
register to become a Member of the Program and create your Account;
change your personal details in your Account profile on the Program Website, the Unity App, or by contacting Unity Customer Care;
participate in the Program, including earning Tier Credits, Unity Points, receiving other Program Benefits or other offers or promotions;
receive Tier Credits;
receive and redeem Unity Points;
receive additional Program Benefits that may apply to you;
use your Unity Card for Game Play;
perform, manage, view your transactions in connection with the Program on your Account;
use your Account to make a reservation or booking at a restaurant, hotel, or any other activity (e.g., a concert, show tickets, tours);
apply for a digital wallet;
purchase or sell any virtual goods or items;
use any of our products or services at a location that accepts our products or services (such as a co-branded payment device or credit card);
enter a contest, promotional program, or survey launched or sponsored by the Program;
participate in a Program event or an event sponsored by the Program;
contact Unity Customer Care;
contact us by letter, email, telephone, text, chat, or through any other written and verbal communications (digital or otherwise);
request information about our products or services, a Participating Location, the Program Website, the Unity App, or the Program;
you request marketing information or other promotional material to be sent to you;
allow someone to act on your behalf to provide us your Personal Information, including for a reservation at a restaurant or for a hotel booking;
connect with us via social media or you post content on Unity social page or a third-party social media website in connection with the Program; or
interact with us or our staff during your visit to a Participating Location, or during the use of digital or online services that we provide.
16. We may also collect your Personal Information indirectly from publicly available sources and third parties, including, but not limited to, the following:
public databases, joint marketing partners, or other third parties;
organizations which provide credit information and credit references;
organizations involved in fraud prevention and detection;
family and friends (for example, when a family member or friend checks into a hotel room on your behalf), or a travel agent, or an employer who makes reservations on your behalf;
companies with whom we partner to provide you with goods, services, or offers based on your activities or experiences at a Participating Location;
one of our Marketing Brands;
Internet-connected devices and our networks available at Participating Locations. For example, if you connect a device to the hotel’s Internet, we may tailor information or services offered to you for a better experience; and
organizations or services that share information with us that is permissible under their own privacy policy (such as our marketing partners or social media platforms).
COOKIES AND OTHER AUTOMATED TECHNOLOGIES.
17. As you interact with the Program Website or the Unity App, we will automatically collect technical data about your equipment, browsing actions, and patterns. We collect this information by using cookies and other automated technologies as described in Sections 19 through 39. We may also receive technical data about you if you visit other websites employing our cookies. We may use such information to analyze the use of the Program Website and improve its features and performance to provide you with a better browsing experience.
(a) Cookies.
18. The Program Website uses “cookies” to help us understand which parts of the Program Website are the most popular and the preferences of Program Website users. We may also use cookies to study traffic patterns on the Program Website, to improve its functionality and usability, to improve the effectiveness of our communications with users, to customize your experience, and to provide greater convenience to you during your interactions with the Program Website.
19. A cookie is a unique alphanumeric identifier that websites use to help identify the number of unique visitors to a website, whether or not those visitors are repeat visitors, and the source of the visits. If you prefer to disable cookies, you may do so through your web browser’s security settings. Please note that certain features of the Program Website may not be available once cookies have been disabled.
20. We may use two types of cookies: (i) Session cookies; and (ii) Persistent Cookies. Session Cookies and Persistent Cookies are categorized as: (a) Strictly Necessary Cookies; (b) Performance Cookies; (c) Functional Cookies; and (d) Targeting Cookies.
21.
Session Cookies
. Session cookies exist only during an online session. They disappear from your device when you close your browser or turn off your device. We use session cookies to allow our systems to uniquely identify you during a session or while you are visiting the Program Website. If you have logged into your Account, this allows us to process your online transactions and requests, and verify your identity as you navigate through the various online pages. If you have disabled your Session Cookies as a guest without logging into your Account, your choice will only be effective for that single session, and you will need to opt-out again.
22.
Persistent Cookies
. Persistent cookies remain on your computer after you have closed your browser or turned off your device.
23.
Strictly Necessary Cookies
. Strictly Necessary Cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. Strictly Necessary Cookies do not store any Personal Information.
24.
Performance Cookies
. Performance Cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of the Program Website. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the Program Website. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow Performance Cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and we will not be able to monitor its performance.
25.
Functional Cookies
. Functional Cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third-party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow Functional Cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
26.
Targeting Cookies
. Targeting Cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. Targeting Cookies do not store directly Personal Information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
(b) Clear GIFs or Web Beacons.
27. Clear GIFs (also known as web beacons, web bugs, or pixel tags) are tiny graphics with a unique identifier, similar in function to cookies. In contrast to cookies, which are stored on your device’s internal storage, clear GIFs are embedded invisibly on web pages. We may use clear GIFs in connection with the Program to, among other things, track the activities of Program Website visitors, help us manage content, and compile statistics about Program Website usage.
28. We and our service providers also use clear GIFs in HTML emails to our guests, to help us track email response rates, identify when our emails are viewed, and track whether our emails are forwarded.
29. Some of our email communications to you may contain links to content on the Program Website. When you click one of these links, it passes information through the Program Website web server before you arrive at the destination web page. We track this click-through data to help determine interest in particular topics and measure the effectiveness of our communications.
30. If you prefer not to be tracked, simply avoid clicking text or graphic links in emails you receive from us. In addition, you may view and change your preferences at any time by using the ‘Privacy Settings’ in your web browser.
(c) Server Log Files.
31. The Program Website gathers certain information automatically and stores it in log files. This information includes internet protocol (
“IP”
) addresses, browser type, operating system, internet service provider (
“ISP”
), referring/exit pages, date/time stamp of access, and clickstream data, and information about the content you view on the Program Website. When you visit the Program Website, the servers automatically log your IP address, the time and duration of your visit, and the time and duration spent on the pages of the Program Website which you view. If you arrive at the Program Website by clicking a paid advertisement or a link in a communication, then the server will capture information that tracks your visit from that link. If you arrive at the Program Website by clicking on a non-paid source, such as a search engine result or link on another website, the server captures information that tracks your visit from that source, to the extent available. The server also captures information from direct traffic. The server log files are not analyzed with respect to individuals.
(d) Geolocation.
32. If you have provided permission (opt-in) through the Unity App on your mobile device to allow us to collect location information, we may obtain your physical location information from technologies like GPS, Wi-Fi, or cell tower proximity. We may use the geolocation features and geolocation information that is collected to provide you with information regarding Participating Locations, events, and promotional offers in, or near, your area or current location.
33. You are able to withdraw your permission for us to acquire physical location information from your mobile device through your mobile device settings at any time. If you have questions about how to disable your mobile device's location services, we recommend you contact your mobile device service provider or the mobile device manufacturer.
(e) Do Not Track Signals.
34. Currently, our systems do not recognize browser “do-not-track” requests. You may, however, disable certain tracking as discussed in the Cookies Section of this Privacy Policy (e.g., by disabling cookies). Please note that we do not collect, and are not aware of third parties that collect, Personal Information from users of the Program Website, or about their online activities on third party websites.
(f) Third-Party Analytics.
35. We use automated devices and applications, such as Google Analytics, to evaluate usage of the Program Website, Unity Apps, and our online services. You can learn about Google’s practices by clicking on
https://policies.google.com/privacy
, and you may opt out by downloading the Google Analytics opt-out browser. The server also captures information from direct traffic. We use these tools to help us improve the Program Website, Unity Apps, our online services, and your user experiences. These devices and applications may use cookies, tracking pixels, and other tracking technologies to perform their functions. We do not share your Personal Information with these third parties.
(g) Unity App.
36. When you download or register to use the Unity App, you may submit Personal Information to us such as your name, email address, phone number, username, password, and other registration information.
37. Further, when you use the Unity App, we may collect certain information automatically, including technical information related to your mobile device, your device's unique identifier, your mobile network information, the type of mobile browser you use, and information about the way you use the Unity App.
38. Only after you have consented to such collection, we may also collect information stored on your device, including contact information, geolocation information or other digital content.
PURPOSE OF PROCESSING PERSONAL INFORMATION & THE TYPES OF PERSONAL INFORMATION PROCESSED.
39. The table below sets out: (i) the purpose of processing activity; and (ii) the types of Personal Information that we may collect and Process.
Purpose of Processing Activity
Types of Personal Information Processed
To register you as a Member.
To register you as a Member of the Program.  This will include an assessment of your eligibility to become a member of the Program.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account Credentials including, where relevant, Personal Identification Number (“
PIN
”) for your Account.
Approved Identification.
To operate the Program.
To operate the Program which includes collecting and processing your Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points at Participating Locations.
Account number and/or other validating information, and if required, your PIN for verification purposes.
Details of your Qualifying Spend.
Redemption of Unity Points.
To assess your entitlements.
To assess your entitlement to Program Benefits.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account number.
Approved Identification.
Details of your Qualifying Spend.
Program Benefits already awarded to your Account and the redemption or use of any of those Program Benefits.
Other transactions which may appear in your Account.
Information we consider relevant in relation to any irregular activity and/or necessary to monitor compliance with the Membership Terms.
To inform you of changes.
To inform you of changes to the Program, Membership Terms, Privacy Policy, your Account status, your Unity Tier, your Unity Points, Program Benefits, and any other Program related information.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account number.
Approved Identification.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
To make better Program offerings to you.
To better service your Membership and your preferences, by analyzing your transactions and identifying existing Program products or services that may be of interest to you, or could be added as additional products or services to the Program.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account number.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
To offer you additional products or services outside of the Program.
To offer you additional products and/or services from Hard Rock Affiliated Parties that are outside the Program or to offer you products or services from select reputable companies with whom we have a strategic relationship with because we believe their offerings may be of interest to you.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
To render products and/or services.
To provide, deliver, charge, and evaluate products and/or services utilized by you at a Participating Location.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Responding to your requests.
Responding to your requests in respect of services, information, data, and concierge services.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
Details of the request.
For communication purposes.
To send you printed or digital communications regarding: your application to join the Program, your Membership, operation of the Program, to inform you of any changes to the Program or your Membership, to make Program offers to you, to offer you additional products or services, to render products or services to you, and to respond to your requests.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Relevant Account details.
For market research.
To send you periodic satisfaction, quality of service or market research surveys.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Date of birth.
Marital status.
Number of children and their ages.
Your opinions/answers.
To enable you to participate in competitions and win prizes.
To enable you to take part in a prize draw, sweepstakes, contests or competitions, including administering your participation in the same, and to notify winners and award prizes, or facilitate an event.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details relevant to your participation in the activity.
For credit applications.
To review and evaluate a credit application that is submitted to us for approval.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
Relevant identifier information to enable us to run a credit check (e.g., SSN).
Financial information that you have submitted to us.
For identification purposes.
To use certain pieces of Personal Information to verify your identity which may be required in respect of providing certain information, or making certain updates or changes to your Account, or for redemptions.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Your PIN.
Date of birth.
Approved Identification.
Business governance.
To administer and protect our business, the Program, the Program Website and Unity App (including troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, system maintenance, support, reporting and hosting of data).
Your Account and any transactions therein.
Web content and advertising.
To deliver relevant website content or Unity App content and advertisements to you and to measure or understand the effectiveness of the advertising we serve to you.
Information relating to the browsing or use of the Program Website and use of the Unity App.
Responses to marketing emails and advertisements.
For safety reasons.
Provide for the safety and security of staff, Members, guests, and other visitors.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Approved Identification.
For security and compliance.
To prevent, detect, and investigate misrepresentations or fraud, cyber incidents, or other illegal activity.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account transactions.
For business analytics.
To use data analytics to improve the Program, Program Website, the Unity App, our products or services, our marketing activities, guest relationships, and Member experiences.
Your Account, and relevant information and transactions therein.
For migrating your existing loyalty data.
To migrate your existing loyalty data from pre-existing rewards or loyalty programs, including, without limitation, Seminole Wild Card, Hard Rock Rewards, Wild Card Rewards, and the Hard Rock Casino Northern Indiana Loyalty Program.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account Credentials, including, where relevant, your Account PIN.
Approved Identification.
Account number(s) and/or other validating information.
Transactions and other relevant information from your pre-existing rewards or loyalty programs.
40. The legal bases for our processing activities include processing: (i) pursuant to your consent; (ii) as necessary to comply with our contractual obligations to you; (iii) as necessary to comply with our legal obligations; (iv) as necessary in order to protect your safety or other vital interest, or the safety or other vital interest of other persons; and (v) as necessary for the purposes of our legitimate business interests, or the legitimate business interests of a third party.
MARKETING COMMUNICATIONS AND YOUR COMMUNICATION PREFERENCES.
41. We may send you marketing communications relating to, or in connection with, the Program, including, but not limited to, about promotions, offers, contests, products or services (those that we offer now or plan to offer), and generally, anything that we believe may be of interest to you relating to, or in connection with, the Program.
42. You may define or update your communication preferences in terms of: (a) whether you wish to receive such marketing communications; and (b) if you receive such marketing communications, the manner in which those marketing communications are received by you from the options available in your online Account (e.g., by physical mail or email). You can select or update your communication preferences directly in your online Account (which can be accessed from the Program Website or through the Unity App) or you can contact Unity Customer Care by telephone at
+1 (888) 519-6683
or by email at
customer_care@hardrock.com
.
Promotional Offers.
43. We may use your Personal Information to form a view on what we think you may want or need, or what may be of interest to you. This is how we decide which products, services or offers may be relevant for you, and based on that, we may send you promotional offers (we call this marketing).
44. You may receive certain marketing communications from us if you have requested information from us, or purchased goods or services from us, and you have not opted out of receiving marketing communications or if you have expressly agreed to receive marketing communications. Hard Rock offers our customers mobile marketing messages. See terms of use for this service by clicking
here
.
Third-Party Marketing.
45. In order to provide you with the highest level of products and services, we may share your Personal Information with carefully selected third parties, who may communicate directly with you. In some jurisdictions, data privacy laws may require us to obtain a separate consent before we do so. You can always choose whether to receive any or all of these communications by contacting us as described in this Privacy Policy. Alternatively, you can express your preference by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link contained within any applicable marketing email sent to you.
Communication Preferences.
46. You can change your marketing communication preferences (including stopping marketing communications) at any time by: (a) logging into your online Account (using the Program Website or the Unity App) and selecting or unselecting the relevant boxes; or (b) contacting us. Alternatively, you can request that marketing emails are no longer sent to you by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link contained within any applicable marketing email sent to you.
47. Please note that if you have requested that that marketing communications are no longer sent to you, you will still continue to receive communications from us: (a) in connection with the operation of the Program and your Account, and any changes thereof; and (b) any transactional information (such as details of any products or services requested or obtained from us).
48. If you have given us your consent to provide your Personal Information to third parties for marketing purposes, you may withdraw your consent at any time by: (a) completing and submitting the online form
Exercising My Rights
; or (b) by calling our toll-free number at
1-833-970-1536
.
49. Hard Rock offers our customers mobile marketing messages. See terms of use for this service by clicking
here
.
WHO WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION WITH AND WHY.
50. We may share your Personal Information with certain third parties and for specific purposes. The table below describes the recipients to whom we may disclose your Personal Information and for which purpose.
Recipients
Purpose for sharing Personal Information
Hard Rock Affiliated Parties, Participating Locations, and Marketing Brands.
For any of the purposes described in the Section headed “
Purpose of Processing and Types of Personal Information Processed
” in this Privacy Policy,
Service providers (e.g., providers of customer relationship management services, marketing services, customer financial services, including, but not limited to, rewards, payments, deposits, credit, and funding, cloud services and information technology services).
To support the Program, offers, promotions, and event management.
To support data analysis, Program Website development, Unity App development, and digital and physical marketing services.
To support the storage of Program information, and the storage of Member personal and transactional information.
To support the earning of Tier Credits, and the earning and redemption of Unity Points.
To fund accounts for Gaming Play.
Professional service providers (e.g., accountants and lawyers)
Where necessary to provide their professional services in the support of our business functions, any reviews, advice, compliance with the Program, or to protect our interests.
51. All the above categories exclude text messaging originator opt-in data and consent; this information will not be shared with any third parties.
52. We may disclose your Personal Information to third parties if necessary or appropriate: (a) to comply with Applicable Laws, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including authorities outside your country of residence and to meet national security or law enforcement requirements; (d) to enforce the Membership Terms; (e) to protect our operations, such as in the event of any reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets or stock; (f) to protect the rights, privacy, safety or property of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties, you or others; (g) to protect any tangible or intangible property of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties; (h) to allow us to pursue available remedies to protect our interests or those of our Members; and (i) to prevent or limit any damages that we may otherwise sustain.
53. We may also share your Personal Information with third parties to whom we may choose to sell, transfer or merge parts of our business or our assets. Alternatively, we may seek to acquire other businesses or merge with them. If a change happens to our business, then the new owners may use your Personal Information in the same way as set out in this Privacy Policy.
54. We may sell your Personal Information to third parties with whom we may partner in order: (a) to provide you with a better guest experience; or (b) for you to receive offers from those third parties that we believe may be of value to you. As of the effective date of this Privacy Policy, we have not sold any of your Personal Information.
HOW LONG DO WE KEEP YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION FOR?
55. We will only retain your Personal Information for as long as reasonably necessary for the purposes for which we collected the Personal Information, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, tax, accounting, or reporting requirements. We may retain your Personal Information for a longer period in the event of a complaint or if we reasonably believe there is a prospect of litigation in respect to our relationship with you.
56. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Information, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the Personal Information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Information, the purposes for which we Process your Personal Information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal, regulatory, tax, accounting, or other requirements. Notwithstanding, as a general policy, we do not retain Personal Information for longer than seven (7) years.
57. In some circumstances we will anonymise your Personal Information (so that it can no longer be associated with you) for historical research or statistical purposes, in which case we may use this information indefinitely without further notice to you.
58. When we no longer need to Process or retain your Personal Information, records, both physical and electronic, will be destroyed.
INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION.
59. As a global organization, we may internationally transfer your Personal Information we collect between the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties (including Hard Rock’s headquarters in the United States), Participating Locations, service providers, and third-party partners.
60. We may store and/or Process your Personal Information in the United States, or in Canada, or in other jurisdictions.
61. Some of the jurisdictions to which Personal Information is transferred may not provide the same level of privacy protection as your local jurisdiction. However, whenever we transfer your Personal Information outside of the European Economic Area (the “
EEA
”) or the United Kingdom (UK), we rely on the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (DPF) and the UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as described in the following section and, in the event of its future invalidation, we implement adequate safeguards in accordance with Applicable Laws in order to ensure a similar degree of protection as the country of origin.
EU-U.S. DATA PRIVACY FRAMEWORK (DPF) AND THE UK EXTENSION TO THE EU-U.S. DPF COMPLIANCE
62. Hard Rock participates in and complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), and the UK Extension of the EU-U.S. DPF as approved by the European Commission in its adequacy decision issued on July 10, 2023. Hard Rock complies with the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension DPF Principles, that were developed by the U.S. Department of Commerce in consultation with the European Commission in order to provide organizations in the United States with a reliable mechanism for personal information transfers to the United States from the EU and UK while ensuring that EU data subjects and UK data subjects continue to benefit from effective safeguards and protection as required by European legislation with respect to the processing of their personal information when they have been transferred to non-EU countries.
63. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension DPF Principles, the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension DPF Principles shall govern.
64. To learn more about the EU-U.S DPF and UK Extension DPF and view our certification, please visit the DPF website at
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search
.
65. Hard Rock commits to cooperate with the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) comply with the advice given by such authorities with regard to human resources data transferred from the EU and UK in the context of the employment relationship.
66. Hard Rock and the following U.S. subsidiaries comply with the EU-U.S. and UK Extension DPF Principles:
Boardwalk 1000, LLC
Hard Rock Cafe International (STP), Inc.
Hard Rock Cafe International (Hollywood), Inc.
Hard Rock Cafe International (Orlando), Inc.
Hard Rock Cafe Merchandise, Inc.
Hard Rock Casino Cincinnati, LLC
Hard Rock Hotel Licensing, Inc.
Seminole Hard Rock Support Services, LLC
Hard Rock Sacramento FM, LLC
Seminole Hard Rock Digital, LLC
Seminole Hard Rock Entertainment, Inc.
Spectacle Gary Holding, LLC
67. In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Hard Rock commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your Personal Information.
68. If you have any question or complaint regarding our participation in the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension of the EU-U.S. DPF or the processing of your Personal Information you may contact us as indicated below in the section of this Privacy Policy “HOW TO CONTACT US”.
DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ARBITRATION
69. When other dispute resolution avenues are exhausted, you may invoke the binding arbitration. Hard Rock Cafe International (USA), Inc. has provided a private sector independent recourse mechanism (located in the United States) to investigate and expeditiously resolve individual complaints and disputes. This dispute mechanism will cover all Personal Information except for human resource data. For more information, visit the website for ICDR®/AAA®EU-U.S. DPF: International Centre for Dispute Resolution®, the international division of the American Arbitration Association® (ICDR/AAA) at
https://www.icdr.org/dpf
. The services of ICDR/AAA are provided at no cost to you.
70. Under certain limited conditions and as a last resort, the individual can invoke binding arbitration. The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Hard Rock’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF.
71. If Hard Rock transfers your Personal Information to a third party, we will ensure the third party is contractually obligated to process your Personal Information only for limited, specific purposes consistent with this policy, to apply the same level of protection to that data as the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and notify us if it makes a determination that it can no longer meet this obligation. Upon notice, Hard Rock will take reasonable and appropriate steps to stop and remediate unauthorized processing. In cases of onward transfer to third parties of Personal Information received pursuant to the EU-U.S. DPF, Hard Rock is potentially liable.
YOUR RIGHTS.
Overview.
72. Under applicable data protection laws, you have a number of rights in relation to the Personal Information that we hold about you. These rights might not apply in every circumstance. You can exercise your rights by contacting us at any time using the details set out in this Privacy Policy (see the Section headed, “
Our Contact Details
”).
73. The table in this Section sets out the rights that you have over your Personal Information. Please note that although we take your rights seriously, there may be some circumstances where we cannot comply with your request. For example, if complying with your request would put us in a position of non-compliance with our own legal or regulatory requirements. In these instances, we will let you know why we cannot satisfy your request.
YOUR RIGHTS
DESCRIPTION
Right of Access
This is commonly known as a “data subject access request”.  It entitles you to inquire whether we are processing your Personal Information, what type of Personal Information, how we process it, and also to receive a copy of the Personal Information we hold about you.
Right to Rectification
This right entitles you to request us to correct any incomplete or inaccurate Personal Information we may hold about you.
We always take care to ensure that the information we hold about you is accurate and where necessary, up to date. As part of the Membership Terms, you are required to provide complete and accurate information in connection with your enrolment and participation in the Program, and to update that information promptly if there are any changes or if it becomes inaccurate.
If you believe that there are any inaccuracies, discrepancies, or gaps in the information we hold about you, you may change your personal details anytime in your account profile on the Program Website or Unity App, or by contacting Unity Customer Care by telephone at
+1 (888) 519-6683
or by email at
customer_care@hardrock.com
.
Note that we may need to verify the accuracy of any new data you provide to us. As such, we may require you to send supporting documentation prior to allowing certain changes (e.g., any changes to your legal name).
Right to Erasure or Right to be Forgotten
This right entitles you, in certain circumstances, to ask us to delete or remove your Personal Information.  These circumstances include, for example:
where we no longer need your Personal Information for the original purpose we collected it for;
where you have exercised your right to withdraw consent;
where you have successfully exercised your Right to Object to processing; or
where we may have processed your information unlawfully or where we are required to erase your Personal Information to comply with local law.
Note, however, that we may not always be able to comply with your request of erasure.  While we will assess every request, there are other factors that we will need to take into consideration.  For example, we may be unable to erase your information if retention of your Personal Information is reasonably necessary to:
meet our legal obligations;
resolve disputes;
maintain security;
prevent fraud and abuse; or
enforce the Membership Terms.
We may also need to retain your Personal Information if required by gaming industry regulations, tax statutes, and other legal requirements (e.g., information on our guests who self-report; tax reporting documents; player winnings, and any statistics, reports or listings that are required to comply with Applicable Laws or protect Participating Locations).
Right to Restriction
This right entitles you to ask us to suspend the processing of your Personal Information in certain scenarios including the following:
if you want us to establish the accuracy of your Personal Information;
where our use of your Personal Information is unlawful, but you do not want us to erase it;
where you need us to hold the Personal Information even if we no longer require it as you need it to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or
where you have objected to our use of your Personal Information, but we need to verify whether we have overriding legitimate grounds to use it.
Right to Data Portability
This right entitles you to request the transfer of your Personal Information to you or to a third party in certain circumstances.
We will provide to you, or a third party you have chosen, your Personal Information in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format.  Note that this right only applies to processing carried out by automated means which you initially provided consent for us to use, or where we used the information to perform a contract with you.
Right to Object
This right entitles you to object to our processing of your Personal Information in certain circumstances.
In some cases, we may refuse your request to object to our processing of your Personal Information, for instance, when we have compelling legitimate grounds to process your Personal Information which outweighs any prejudice to your rights and freedoms.
With respect to direct marketing, you have certain controls over the extent to which we market to you, and you have the right to request that we stop sending you certain marketing messages at any time.  For information about how to let us know you do not want to receive certain marketing messages, see the Section entitled, “
Marketing Communications And Your Communication Preferences
”.
Please note that even if you exercise this right because you do not want to receive certain marketing messages, we may still send you Program, Account, and transactional related communications where necessary.
Right not to be subject to a decision based solely on Automated Decision-Making, including Profiling
We may use your Personal Information and share it with advertisers and advertising networks, analytics and search engine providers, social networking companies (i.e., Facebook), and rewards companies for the purpose of “profiling”, which includes evaluating your personal aspects to analyze or predict aspects concerning your economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behaviour, location, or movements and segmenting you into a group with other Members or other persons who have similar personal characteristics.  We may use this profiling to make automated decisions, meaning without human interference, to improve the efficiency of our marketing and to offer certain benefits to you or other persons based on this profiling.  You have the right to opt-out at any time of our sharing of your Personal Information in this way.
In addition, we may also use your Personal Information to generate a “lookalike audience” or similar audience of prospective customers through the platforms of advertisers and advertising networks, analytics and search engine providers, social networking companies (e.g., Facebook) and rewards companies.  This allows us to target advertisements to potential customers who appear to have shared interests or similar demographics to you (based on the platform’s own data).  By way of example, we do this by uploading a data list to Facebook that is encrypted and anonymized (i.e., you cannot be individually identified on the data list).  Facebook then matches the encrypted and anonymized data list against Facebook’s own customer base to generate the lookalike audience.  Facebook then deletes the data list we provided to them, and uses it for no other purpose. We do not have access to the identity of anybody in the lookalike audience generated from Facebook’s own customer base, unless they choose to click on the ads for our products and services.
74. You can exercise your rights described in this Privacy Policy by contacting us using the contact details set out in the Section entitled, “How to Contact Us”. As a security measure, we may need to verify your identity when we receive your request, and we may need you to provide valid proof of identification. In addition, we may also contact you to ask for more information about your request to help us with our response.
75. Note that if you exercise your rights over your Personal Information and have more than one account with us, you will need to instruct us on each account separately.
No Fee Usually Required.
76. You will not have to pay a fee to access your Personal Information (or to exercise any of your rights described in this Section). However, we may charge a reasonable fee if we, in our sole discretion, consider your request is unfounded, repetitive, or excessive. Alternatively, we may refuse to comply with your request.
Response Time.
77. We try to respond to all legitimate requests based on your rights described in this Privacy Policy within one (1) month. Occasionally it could take us longer than one (1) month if your request is particularly complex or you have made a number of requests. In this case, we will notify you and keep you updated.
THIRD-PARTY LINKS.
78. The Program Website and the Unity App may contain links to third-party websites, plug-ins, and applications (“
Third-Party Platforms
”) whose privacy policies may differ from ours.
79. Clicking on those links may allow third parties to collect or share Personal Information about you. If you leave the Program Website or Unity App, we encourage you to carefully read and understand the privacy policies issued by these Third-Party Platforms.
80. Please note that we do not control these Third-Party Platforms and are not responsible for their privacy policies, statements, and practices (even if you access such platforms using links from the Program Website or Unity App). We do not accept any responsibility or liability in respect of these Third-Party Platforms.
HOW WE KEEP YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION SECURE.
81. We use industry standard security safeguards to help protect Personal Information from unauthorized access, alteration, or disclosure. In addition, we limit access to your Personal Information to those employees, agents, contractors, service providers, and other third parties who have a business need to know. They will only Process your Personal Information on our instructions, and they are subject to a duty of confidentiality. Despite these efforts, please understand that as no system is perfect, we cannot guarantee that unauthorized access or theft of data will not occur, so you should exercise caution when transferring personal and other sensitive information over the Internet.
82. Please advise us immediately at
dataprotection@hardrock.com
of any incident involving the loss of or unauthorized access to or disclosure of Personal Information that is in our custody or control. We maintain Incident Response and Business Continuity Plans to address data incident situations.
83. You are responsible for keeping your Account Credentials confidential. You should not share such Account Credentials with any other person, as you are responsible for all activity on your Account. Be sure to sign off when finished if you are using a shared device. You must notify us immediately if you are aware or suspect any unauthorized use of your Account. Please note that we will never ask for a password other than on the log-in page on your Unity online account (which is accessible through the Program Website or the Unity App). Links are available on the Program Website and the Unity App to request assistance for logging into your online Account.
PROTECTING CHILDREN.
84. We are mindful of the privacy of children as they may be less aware of the risks, consequences and safeguards concerned, and their rights in relation to the processing of Personal Information. For these reasons, promotions, and activities by us addressed to children always receive specific attention and protection. We always rely on consent as a lawful basis for processing of Personal Information relating to children, and we always get consent from whoever holds custodial responsibility for the child.
UPDATES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY.
85. We reserve the right to update, change, revise, modify, amend, supplement, or replace this Privacy Policy (collectively, the “
Changes
”) at any time in our sole discretion by providing notice of the Changes by posting the revised Privacy Policy (incorporating the Changes) to the Program Website. In addition, we, in our sole discretion (unless required by Applicable Laws), may provide notice of the Changes by sending a copy of the revised Privacy Policy via email to Members. If you continue to access or use the Program Website or the Unity App, or continue to participate in the Program, after the revised Privacy Policy has been posted, or after receiving a copy of the revised Privacy Policy (incorporating the Changes) by email (if we choose to send you an email); then subject to Applicable Laws, you will be deemed to have accepted such Changes and the revised Privacy Policy shall become binding upon you as of the date that the revised Privacy Policy became effective. We therefore encourage you to review our Privacy Policy periodically for the most up-to-date information.
86. If you disagree with the revised Privacy Policy, then your sole and exclusive remedy is to withdraw from the Program and terminate your Membership in accordance with the Membership Terms.
U.S. STATE-SPECIFIC PRIVACY LAWS.
87. If you reside in U.S. States with comprehensive data privacy laws, then, in addition to the rights you have under this Privacy Policy, you are entitled to the additional disclosures and rights set out in the U.S State-Specific Privacy Laws depending on the particular State in which you reside. Please click this link
U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws
to see the additional disclosures and rights that apply to you. Please check the above link regularly for any updates that may apply to you or your place of residence.
HOW TO CONTACT US.
88.
Global Data Protection & Risk Office.
Our Global Data Protection & Risk Office is responsible for overseeing this Privacy Policy.  If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, or you wish to exercise any of your rights set out in the Section entitled “
Your Rights
” of this Privacy Policy, please: (1) contact our Global Data Protection & Risk Office by using the contact details below, or
(2) complete and submit the online form which can be accessed at the link below.
To:
Global Data Protection & Risk Office
Seminole Hard Rock Support Services, LLC d/b/a Unity Global Services
Postal address:
5701 Stirling Road,
Davie, Florida 33314
United States of America
Email address:
dataprotection@hardrock.com
Telephone number:
+1-833-970-1536
(U.S. toll-free); or
+1-954-498-9834
Website:
unity.hardrock.com
Online Form Link:
You can exercise any of your rights by submitting the online form
Exercising My Rights
89. Please include your first name, last name, address, phone number, email address, and any relevant account or reference number in all communications and state clearly the nature of your request or concern. If you wish to exercise your privacy rights mentioned in the Section entitled “Your Rights” of this Privacy Policy, please mention the name of the right you would like to exercise in the subject of your request. As a security measure, we may need to verify your identity when we receive your request, and we may need you to provide valid proof of identification. If we decline to take action regarding your request, we shall inform you of the justification for declining to take action and shall provide you with instructions on how to appeal our decision (you can appeal our decision by following those instructions).
90.
UK Contact Information.
For residents in the UK, please contact our UK Data Privacy Representative by using the following contact details:
To:
UK Unity Data Privacy
Postal address:
148 Old Park Lane,
London W1K IQY
United Kingdom
Email address:
dataprotection@hardrock.com
Telephone number:
+
44-020-7514-1700
91. You have the right to make a complaint at any time to the Information Commissioner’s Office (“
ICO
”), the UK regulator for data protection issues (
www.ico.org.uk
). We would, however, appreciate the chance to deal with your concerns before you approach the ICO, so we ask that you please contact us in the first instance.
92.
EEA Contact Information.
For residents of the EEA, please contact our EEA Data Privacy Representative by using the following contact details:
To:
EEA Unity Data Privacy
Studio Legale PANETTA
Postal address:
Via Arenula, 83
00186 Roma RM, Italy
Email address:
dataprotection@hardrock.co.it
Telephone number:
+
39-06-6821-0129
93. You have the right to make a complaint at any time with a supervisory authority based in the EEA; in particular, a supervisory authority in the EEA country of your habitual residence, place of work, or of an alleged infringement of data protection laws.
94. In all cases, we will do our best to answer any question and resolve any complaint to your satisfaction.
Appendix 1 (China)
This Appendix contains additional privacy provisions that, in addition to the Privacy Policy, apply within the borders of People’s Republic of China (PRC), excluding Hong Kong Special Administrative Region, Macau Special Administrative Region and Taiwan.
Mini-program
.  This Appendix to the Privacy Policy explains how we, the Program Website, and/or our WeChat Mini program (the "
Mini-program
") collect and otherwise process Personal Information. You may choose to submit Personal Information (such as your name, IDENTIFICATION CARD NUMBER, ADDRESS, e-mail address, birthdate, and telephone number) to us at a Participating Location, through the Program Website, or the Mini-program. We collect, store, use, process, transfer, provide, delete, or otherwise process Personal Information for providing services to you regarding the Program and other business purposes set out in the Privacy Policy only unless otherwise permitted by Applicable Laws. We will not share this information in ways different from what is disclosed in the Privacy Policy. If you have any questions about this Appendix, the Privacy Policy, the Website, or the Mini-program, please contact us at
dataprotection@hardrock.com
Personal Information Rights
.
Change or Correct
:  You can request that we change or correct your Personal Information. Among others, if you created an account with us, you can review and edit your Personal Information by logging onto the Website or the Mini-program and visiting your account. Please note that personal profile information supplied by you on the Website or the Mini-program can be accessed by you online at any time and no charge.
Withdrawing Consent
.  If we have collected or processed your Personal Information with your consent, you may withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect the processing of your Personal Information based on other lawful processing grounds.
Explanation
. You can request us to explain our Personal Information processing rules.
Access, correction, amendment, deletion.
If you request access, correction, amendment, or deletion of your Personal Information and you have more than one account with us, you will need to instruct us on each account separately. Reasonable access to Personal Information will generally be provided within thirty (30) calendar days at no cost to you, subject to limited exceptions prescribed by Applicable Laws or excessive requests.
Please note that we may need to retain certain Personal Information for recordkeeping purposes or to complete transactions that occurred prior to your request. We will also retain your Personal Information if reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations, meet regulatory requirements, resolve disputes, maintain security, prevent fraud and abuse, to the extent permissible by Applicable Laws.
Right not to provide information
.
You have the right not to provide Personal Information. However, if you elect not to provide the necessary Personal Information as described above, you may not be able to utilize some or all of the Program services.
Sensitive Information
.
THE PPERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT AND PROCESS MAY CONTAIN SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION. THE INFORMATION WE COLLECT AND WHICH MIGHT BE DEEMED AS SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION IS IN UPPERCASE IN THE PRIVACY POLICY FOR YOUR SPECIAL ATTENTION, INCLUDING YOUR IDENTIFICATION CARD NUMBER, ADDRESSES, PAYMENT INFORMATION, GEOLOCATION, THE PERSONAL INFORMATION OF YOUR CHILDREN UNDER 14 YEARS OLD, ETC. In each case, we will make sure that the processing of your sensitive Personal Information is for specific purposes as described in the Privacy Policy and is necessary; we will take strict security measures when processing the sensitive Personal Information and such processing will be conducted in a manner having the least impact on your personal rights and interests.
YOU EXPRESSLY AND VOLUNTARILY CONSENT TO THE PROCESSING BY US OF YOUR SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION FOR THE PURPOSES AND IN THE MANNER DESCRIBED IN THE PRIVACY POLICY.
Data Sharing and Transfers
.
In addition, to the extent permissible under Applicable Laws of China, we may share your Personal Information to local, state, federal, and foreign countries as mandated by their reporting requirements; and governmental authorities to comply with legal, regulatory, or administrative requirements, or as otherwise required by the U.S. or other law. In such case, we will notify you of the name and contact information of the foreign recipients, their information processing purposes and methods and the types of Personal Information processed by them and other information, to the extent required under applicable law. We may also disclose your Personal Information where necessary to prevent actual or suspected loss or harm to persons or property, or as otherwise permitted by law.English
Arabic
Azerbaijani
Catalan
Chinese - Simplified
Chinese - Traditional
Croatian
Czech
Dutch
French
German
Greek
Hungarian
Indonesian
Italian
Japanese
Malaysian
Polish
Portuguese (Portugal)
Romanian
Russian
Spanish
Thai
Vietnamese
English
Loading...
UNITY™ BY HARD ROCK PRIVACY POLICY
Last Update: August 23, 2024
INTRODUCTION
1. This Privacy Policy is administered by Seminole Hard Rock Support Services, LLC, d/b/a HR Unity Global Services, 5701 Stirling Road, Davie, Florida 33314, United States of America (the “
Program Manager
”) on behalf of Hard Rock Affiliated Parties.
2. This Privacy Policy applies and governs when you:
access or use the Unity Program Website (the “
Program Website
”) at
unity.hardrock.com
;
download, access, or use the mobile application made available by us in connection with the Program; or
use our products or services in relation to, or in connection with, the Program.
3. This Privacy Policy explains how we may collect, use and share (collectively, “
Process
”) your Personal Information in relation to, and in connection with, the Unity by Hard Rock loyalty program, which is also known as Unity™ or as Unity by Seminole Gaming™ (collectively, the “
Program
”).
4. This Privacy Policy also provides information about your rights with respect to your Personal Information and how you can contact us if you have any concern or questions about your Personal Information.
5. The Program Manager is the data controller of your Personal Information under the Program. This means, in relation to the Program, that the Program Manager has overall say and control over the reason and purposes behind the collection of your Personal Information and the means and method of any processing of your Personal Information.
6. When you visit the Program Website, use the Unity App, use any product, service, or benefit of the Program, or interact with us, and provide your Personal Information to us, your Personal Information will be processed in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
7. You acknowledge that we shall, in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Policy, use any Personal Information already held or obtained in connection with, or as a result of, you being a member of, or participating in, a pre-existing rewards or loyalty program, including, without limitation, any one or more of the following rewards or loyalty programs: (i) Seminole Wild Card; (ii) Hard Rock Rewards; (iii) Wild Card Rewards; or (iv) Hard Rock Casino Northern Indiana Loyalty Program.
8. We may collect certain Personal Information about you to provide you with the services, features and benefits of the Program and also to facilitate our relationship with you in connection with the Program. Providing Personal Information is optional. You may choose not to provide the requested Personal Information; however, you may not be able to access and use some or all of the features or benefits of the Program for which your Personal Information is required.
9. We may update this Privacy Policy at any time, and any updates to this Privacy Policy will be effective on the date specified in the updated Privacy Policy.
10. Where additional detailed information is needed to explain our privacy practices, we will provide such information in supplementary privacy notices.
11. This Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected by any third party, including, but not limited to, a third-party website, third-party applications, or third-party advertising that may link to or be accessible from or on the Program Website or the Unity App. Please review the privacy policies of any third-party website or application for more information about how they process your Personal Information.
12. This Privacy Policy is provided in a layered format so you can click through to the specific sections of this Privacy Policy. Alternatively, you may view and/or download a Portable Document Format (.pdf) version of this Privacy Policy
here
.
Definitions
13. In this Privacy Policy, the following words shall have the following meanings:
"Account"
means an account assigned to a Member under the Program for the recording of Tier Credits, Unity Points, and if appropriate, other Program Benefits of that Member, as well as other relevant Member information.
"Account Credentials"
means in relation to a Member: (a) the unique Account number allocated to that Member or their email address; and (b) the password selected by that Member to access their Account.
"Additional Terms"
means the additional terms and conditions, rules, and policies, which apply to the Program, such as those applicable to the earning and redemption of Unity Points, that may be posted on the Program Website at
unity.hardrock.com
.
"Applicable Laws"
means any and all laws, ordinances, constitutions, regulations, statutes, treaties, rules, codes, permits, principles of common law, requirements, and orders adopted, enacted, implemented, promulgated, issued, entered, or deemed applicable by or under the authority of any governmental body having jurisdiction over you, the Program, the Program Manager, or any Hard Rock Affiliated Parties, in any way.
"Approved Identification"
means a valid and unexpired government-issued photo identification (e.g., driver’s license, passport, state identification card, or military identification) or other types of identification that may be accepted by Management in its sole discretion.
"Excluded Purchase"
means any of the following expenditures:
the purchase or redemption of any gift cards issued by any of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties;
Non-Qualifying Stays and bookings at packaged rates or discounted or promotional items that are specifically excluded (or if excluded in part, then the excluded part) from the Program;
the purchase of tickets to Hard Rock entertainment events or live events at Participating Locations unless specifically designated as eligible for Unity Points;
purchases at any location that is not a Participating Location;
purchases at non-participating third-party restaurants, retail stores, or other services, including, but not limited to third-party food delivery services (e.g., DoorDash, Grubhub, Uber Eats, etc.), even if located within a Participating Location;
purchases not paid for directly by the Member (e.g., restaurant charges that are billed to a Member’s room and are paid for by a Member’s employer);
group events (i.e., weddings, meetings, receptions, and group menu-based events);
sales, use or personal federal, state, or local taxes, including, but not limited to, VAT and GST;
gratuities; and
any products or services for which it is illegal or prohibited under any Applicable Laws to issue or redeem Unity Points or other Program Benefits.
crew room rate, at a business, employee or friends and family rate,
"Game Play"
means slot machine, other electronic gaming machine, table game play, online gaming, bingo, poker, keno, race and sports betting, social gaming play, or other gaming activities as may be offered at a Participating Location subject to Applicable Laws.
"Hard Rock Affiliated Parties"
means any entity that is an affiliate of or is controlled by, under the control of, under common control with, or managed by, the Program Manager, as well as any Participating Location, or any franchisee or licensee that is operating a Participating Location. For purposes of this definition, “control”, “controlled by”, “under common control with” means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of such entity, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by agreement, or otherwise.
"Management"
means the management of the Participating Location.
"Marketing Brands"
means the following brands:
Hard Rock®;
Hard Rock Cafe®;
Hard Rock Casino®;
Hard Rock Hotel;
Hard Rock Hotel & Casino®;
Hard Rock Digital®;
Rock Shop®;
Seminole Gaming®;
Reverb®; and
Reverb by Hard Rock®.
and any such other brands, trademarks, or trade names used by any of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties for marketing purposes.
"Member"
means a registered member of the Program.
"Membership"
means your enrollment and participation in the Program in accordance with the Membership Terms.
"Membership Terms"
means the Unity By Hard Rock™ Loyalty Program Terms and Conditions and any Additional Terms and any changes to them.
"Non-Gaming Items"
means non-gaming activities, products, or services, including, but not limited to, hotel, cafe, spa, food and beverage, bar, nightclub, live events, retail shop, offered by a Participating Location.
"Non-Qualifying Stay"
means any stay at a Participating Location that is not a Qualifying Stay and includes, but is not limited to, any stay that is:
booked through: (i) tour operators, (ii) vacation clubs or similar programs, (iii) online channels, or other third party channels (irrespective of rate paid), including, but not limited to, expedia.com, trip.com, hotwire.com, priceline.com, orbitz.com, booking.com, travelocity.com, or (iv) third-party branded booking engines (including but not limited to ReservHotel, Despegar, Tripset) that allow package reservations (e.g., combination of hotel with flight, car rental, etc.);
booked through any “opaque” channel where the Marketing Brand may or may not be known at the time of purchase;
booked at a wholesaler or contracted rate where the Member does not directly pay the Participating Location;
greater than thirty (30) consecutive days whereby the first thirty (30) days are deemed a Qualifying Stay but any additional days beyond thirty (30) consecutive days for a stay would not qualify;
provided on a complimentary basis; or
voucher or third-party award redemptions.
"Participating Location"
means any location, outlet, or website participating in the Program, including, but not limited to, participating Seminole Casinos, Seminole Hard Rock Hotel & Casinos, Hard Rock Casinos, Reverb Hotels, Hard Rock Cafe restaurant locations, and Rock Shops. A current list of Participating Locations is provided on the Program Website.
"Personal Information"
means any information relating to an identified or identifiable individual; an identifiable individual is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or to one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural or social identity of that natural person.
"Privacy Policy"
means this privacy policy and any Changes.
"Program Benefits"
means Tier Credits, Unity Points, together with any other Program benefits described on the Program Website.
"Qualifying Spend"
means any purchase of any product or service at a Participating Location that is eligible to earn Tier Credits and Unity Points as set forth on the Program Website, or at a Participating Location, including Game Play and Non Gaming Items, but not including Excluded Purchases.
"Qualifying Stay"
means a stay at a Participating Location (excluding a Non-Qualifying Stay) booked directly through: (a) a Marketing Brand’s central reservation office, website or mobile application; (b) a Participating Location; or (c) an authorized travel agent; or (d) an approved channel, at: (i) public rates; or (ii) non-public rates (where under the applicable booking contract, the booking is deemed to be eligible to earn Tier Credits and Unity Points on all or part of the booking). For the avoidance of doubt, non-public rates may include discounted rates such as advanced purchase rates, group rates, corporate negotiated rates, and government rates.
"Tier Credits"
means those credits issued to a Member’s Account that are used solely to determine the applicable Unity Tier for a Member each year, and are non redeemable, cannot be converted to cash, or cannot be used towards any purchase.
"Unity App"
means the mobile application made available by the Program Manager in connection with the Program.
"Unity Card"
means an authorized card issued by the Program Manager to the Member under the Program either in physical or digital form (including, without limitation, digital card functionality within the Unity App).
"Unity Points"
means points credited to a Member’s Account as a result of a Qualifying Spend that the Member can, subject to Applicable Laws (and any rules of the relevant Participating Location), redeem for permitted merchandise or services, or towards permitted purchases at a Participating Location.
"Unity Tier"
means a tier of the Program available to a Member (with associated Program Benefits) based on Tier Credits earned by that Member as set forth on the Program Website.
"We", "we", "Our" "our", "Us", or "us"
means the Program Manager.
"You", "you", "Your", or "your"
means you as a Member (or potential Member) of the Program.
14. In this Privacy Policy, a reference to “Section” or “section” is a reference to a Section of this Privacy Policy; and words importing the singular include the plural and vice versa.
WHEN AND HOW DO WE COLLECT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION.
15. We may collect your Personal Information directly from you when you:
access or use the Program Website;
download, access or use the Unity App;
register to become a Member of the Program and create your Account;
change your personal details in your Account profile on the Program Website, the Unity App, or by contacting Unity Customer Care;
participate in the Program, including earning Tier Credits, Unity Points, receiving other Program Benefits or other offers or promotions;
receive Tier Credits;
receive and redeem Unity Points;
receive additional Program Benefits that may apply to you;
use your Unity Card for Game Play;
perform, manage, view your transactions in connection with the Program on your Account;
use your Account to make a reservation or booking at a restaurant, hotel, or any other activity (e.g., a concert, show tickets, tours);
apply for a digital wallet;
purchase or sell any virtual goods or items;
use any of our products or services at a location that accepts our products or services (such as a co-branded payment device or credit card);
enter a contest, promotional program, or survey launched or sponsored by the Program;
participate in a Program event or an event sponsored by the Program;
contact Unity Customer Care;
contact us by letter, email, telephone, text, chat, or through any other written and verbal communications (digital or otherwise);
request information about our products or services, a Participating Location, the Program Website, the Unity App, or the Program;
you request marketing information or other promotional material to be sent to you;
allow someone to act on your behalf to provide us your Personal Information, including for a reservation at a restaurant or for a hotel booking;
connect with us via social media or you post content on Unity social page or a third-party social media website in connection with the Program; or
interact with us or our staff during your visit to a Participating Location, or during the use of digital or online services that we provide.
16. We may also collect your Personal Information indirectly from publicly available sources and third parties, including, but not limited to, the following:
public databases, joint marketing partners, or other third parties;
organizations which provide credit information and credit references;
organizations involved in fraud prevention and detection;
family and friends (for example, when a family member or friend checks into a hotel room on your behalf), or a travel agent, or an employer who makes reservations on your behalf;
companies with whom we partner to provide you with goods, services, or offers based on your activities or experiences at a Participating Location;
one of our Marketing Brands;
Internet-connected devices and our networks available at Participating Locations. For example, if you connect a device to the hotel’s Internet, we may tailor information or services offered to you for a better experience; and
organizations or services that share information with us that is permissible under their own privacy policy (such as our marketing partners or social media platforms).
COOKIES AND OTHER AUTOMATED TECHNOLOGIES.
17. As you interact with the Program Website or the Unity App, we will automatically collect technical data about your equipment, browsing actions, and patterns. We collect this information by using cookies and other automated technologies as described in Sections 19 through 39. We may also receive technical data about you if you visit other websites employing our cookies. We may use such information to analyze the use of the Program Website and improve its features and performance to provide you with a better browsing experience.
(a) Cookies.
18. The Program Website uses “cookies” to help us understand which parts of the Program Website are the most popular and the preferences of Program Website users. We may also use cookies to study traffic patterns on the Program Website, to improve its functionality and usability, to improve the effectiveness of our communications with users, to customize your experience, and to provide greater convenience to you during your interactions with the Program Website.
19. A cookie is a unique alphanumeric identifier that websites use to help identify the number of unique visitors to a website, whether or not those visitors are repeat visitors, and the source of the visits. If you prefer to disable cookies, you may do so through your web browser’s security settings. Please note that certain features of the Program Website may not be available once cookies have been disabled.
20. We may use two types of cookies: (i) Session cookies; and (ii) Persistent Cookies. Session Cookies and Persistent Cookies are categorized as: (a) Strictly Necessary Cookies; (b) Performance Cookies; (c) Functional Cookies; and (d) Targeting Cookies.
21.
Session Cookies
. Session cookies exist only during an online session. They disappear from your device when you close your browser or turn off your device. We use session cookies to allow our systems to uniquely identify you during a session or while you are visiting the Program Website. If you have logged into your Account, this allows us to process your online transactions and requests, and verify your identity as you navigate through the various online pages. If you have disabled your Session Cookies as a guest without logging into your Account, your choice will only be effective for that single session, and you will need to opt-out again.
22.
Persistent Cookies
. Persistent cookies remain on your computer after you have closed your browser or turned off your device.
23.
Strictly Necessary Cookies
. Strictly Necessary Cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. Strictly Necessary Cookies do not store any Personal Information.
24.
Performance Cookies
. Performance Cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of the Program Website. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the Program Website. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow Performance Cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and we will not be able to monitor its performance.
25.
Functional Cookies
. Functional Cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third-party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow Functional Cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
26.
Targeting Cookies
. Targeting Cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. Targeting Cookies do not store directly Personal Information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
(b) Clear GIFs or Web Beacons.
27. Clear GIFs (also known as web beacons, web bugs, or pixel tags) are tiny graphics with a unique identifier, similar in function to cookies. In contrast to cookies, which are stored on your device’s internal storage, clear GIFs are embedded invisibly on web pages. We may use clear GIFs in connection with the Program to, among other things, track the activities of Program Website visitors, help us manage content, and compile statistics about Program Website usage.
28. We and our service providers also use clear GIFs in HTML emails to our guests, to help us track email response rates, identify when our emails are viewed, and track whether our emails are forwarded.
29. Some of our email communications to you may contain links to content on the Program Website. When you click one of these links, it passes information through the Program Website web server before you arrive at the destination web page. We track this click-through data to help determine interest in particular topics and measure the effectiveness of our communications.
30. If you prefer not to be tracked, simply avoid clicking text or graphic links in emails you receive from us. In addition, you may view and change your preferences at any time by using the ‘Privacy Settings’ in your web browser.
(c) Server Log Files.
31. The Program Website gathers certain information automatically and stores it in log files. This information includes internet protocol (
“IP”
) addresses, browser type, operating system, internet service provider (
“ISP”
), referring/exit pages, date/time stamp of access, and clickstream data, and information about the content you view on the Program Website. When you visit the Program Website, the servers automatically log your IP address, the time and duration of your visit, and the time and duration spent on the pages of the Program Website which you view. If you arrive at the Program Website by clicking a paid advertisement or a link in a communication, then the server will capture information that tracks your visit from that link. If you arrive at the Program Website by clicking on a non-paid source, such as a search engine result or link on another website, the server captures information that tracks your visit from that source, to the extent available. The server also captures information from direct traffic. The server log files are not analyzed with respect to individuals.
(d) Geolocation.
32. If you have provided permission (opt-in) through the Unity App on your mobile device to allow us to collect location information, we may obtain your physical location information from technologies like GPS, Wi-Fi, or cell tower proximity. We may use the geolocation features and geolocation information that is collected to provide you with information regarding Participating Locations, events, and promotional offers in, or near, your area or current location.
33. You are able to withdraw your permission for us to acquire physical location information from your mobile device through your mobile device settings at any time. If you have questions about how to disable your mobile device's location services, we recommend you contact your mobile device service provider or the mobile device manufacturer.
(e) Do Not Track Signals.
34. Currently, our systems do not recognize browser “do-not-track” requests. You may, however, disable certain tracking as discussed in the Cookies Section of this Privacy Policy (e.g., by disabling cookies). Please note that we do not collect, and are not aware of third parties that collect, Personal Information from users of the Program Website, or about their online activities on third party websites.
(f) Third-Party Analytics.
35. We use automated devices and applications, such as Google Analytics, to evaluate usage of the Program Website, Unity Apps, and our online services. You can learn about Google’s practices by clicking on
https://policies.google.com/privacy
, and you may opt out by downloading the Google Analytics opt-out browser. The server also captures information from direct traffic. We use these tools to help us improve the Program Website, Unity Apps, our online services, and your user experiences. These devices and applications may use cookies, tracking pixels, and other tracking technologies to perform their functions. We do not share your Personal Information with these third parties.
(g) Unity App.
36. When you download or register to use the Unity App, you may submit Personal Information to us such as your name, email address, phone number, username, password, and other registration information.
37. Further, when you use the Unity App, we may collect certain information automatically, including technical information related to your mobile device, your device's unique identifier, your mobile network information, the type of mobile browser you use, and information about the way you use the Unity App.
38. Only after you have consented to such collection, we may also collect information stored on your device, including contact information, geolocation information or other digital content.
PURPOSE OF PROCESSING PERSONAL INFORMATION & THE TYPES OF PERSONAL INFORMATION PROCESSED.
39. The table below sets out: (i) the purpose of processing activity; and (ii) the types of Personal Information that we may collect and Process.
Purpose of Processing Activity
Types of Personal Information Processed
To register you as a Member.
To register you as a Member of the Program.  This will include an assessment of your eligibility to become a member of the Program.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account Credentials including, where relevant, Personal Identification Number (“
PIN
”) for your Account.
Approved Identification.
To operate the Program.
To operate the Program which includes collecting and processing your Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points at Participating Locations.
Account number and/or other validating information, and if required, your PIN for verification purposes.
Details of your Qualifying Spend.
Redemption of Unity Points.
To assess your entitlements.
To assess your entitlement to Program Benefits.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account number.
Approved Identification.
Details of your Qualifying Spend.
Program Benefits already awarded to your Account and the redemption or use of any of those Program Benefits.
Other transactions which may appear in your Account.
Information we consider relevant in relation to any irregular activity and/or necessary to monitor compliance with the Membership Terms.
To inform you of changes.
To inform you of changes to the Program, Membership Terms, Privacy Policy, your Account status, your Unity Tier, your Unity Points, Program Benefits, and any other Program related information.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account number.
Approved Identification.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
To make better Program offerings to you.
To better service your Membership and your preferences, by analyzing your transactions and identifying existing Program products or services that may be of interest to you, or could be added as additional products or services to the Program.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account number.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
To offer you additional products or services outside of the Program.
To offer you additional products and/or services from Hard Rock Affiliated Parties that are outside the Program or to offer you products or services from select reputable companies with whom we have a strategic relationship with because we believe their offerings may be of interest to you.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
To render products and/or services.
To provide, deliver, charge, and evaluate products and/or services utilized by you at a Participating Location.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Responding to your requests.
Responding to your requests in respect of services, information, data, and concierge services.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
Details of the request.
For communication purposes.
To send you printed or digital communications regarding: your application to join the Program, your Membership, operation of the Program, to inform you of any changes to the Program or your Membership, to make Program offers to you, to offer you additional products or services, to render products or services to you, and to respond to your requests.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Relevant Account details.
For market research.
To send you periodic satisfaction, quality of service or market research surveys.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Date of birth.
Marital status.
Number of children and their ages.
Your opinions/answers.
To enable you to participate in competitions and win prizes.
To enable you to take part in a prize draw, sweepstakes, contests or competitions, including administering your participation in the same, and to notify winners and award prizes, or facilitate an event.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details relevant to your participation in the activity.
For credit applications.
To review and evaluate a credit application that is submitted to us for approval.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
Relevant identifier information to enable us to run a credit check (e.g., SSN).
Financial information that you have submitted to us.
For identification purposes.
To use certain pieces of Personal Information to verify your identity which may be required in respect of providing certain information, or making certain updates or changes to your Account, or for redemptions.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Your PIN.
Date of birth.
Approved Identification.
Business governance.
To administer and protect our business, the Program, the Program Website and Unity App (including troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, system maintenance, support, reporting and hosting of data).
Your Account and any transactions therein.
Web content and advertising.
To deliver relevant website content or Unity App content and advertisements to you and to measure or understand the effectiveness of the advertising we serve to you.
Information relating to the browsing or use of the Program Website and use of the Unity App.
Responses to marketing emails and advertisements.
For safety reasons.
Provide for the safety and security of staff, Members, guests, and other visitors.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Approved Identification.
For security and compliance.
To prevent, detect, and investigate misrepresentations or fraud, cyber incidents, or other illegal activity.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account transactions.
For business analytics.
To use data analytics to improve the Program, Program Website, the Unity App, our products or services, our marketing activities, guest relationships, and Member experiences.
Your Account, and relevant information and transactions therein.
For migrating your existing loyalty data.
To migrate your existing loyalty data from pre-existing rewards or loyalty programs, including, without limitation, Seminole Wild Card, Hard Rock Rewards, Wild Card Rewards, and the Hard Rock Casino Northern Indiana Loyalty Program.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account Credentials, including, where relevant, your Account PIN.
Approved Identification.
Account number(s) and/or other validating information.
Transactions and other relevant information from your pre-existing rewards or loyalty programs.
40. The legal bases for our processing activities include processing: (i) pursuant to your consent; (ii) as necessary to comply with our contractual obligations to you; (iii) as necessary to comply with our legal obligations; (iv) as necessary in order to protect your safety or other vital interest, or the safety or other vital interest of other persons; and (v) as necessary for the purposes of our legitimate business interests, or the legitimate business interests of a third party.
MARKETING COMMUNICATIONS AND YOUR COMMUNICATION PREFERENCES.
41. We may send you marketing communications relating to, or in connection with, the Program, including, but not limited to, about promotions, offers, contests, products or services (those that we offer now or plan to offer), and generally, anything that we believe may be of interest to you relating to, or in connection with, the Program.
42. You may define or update your communication preferences in terms of: (a) whether you wish to receive such marketing communications; and (b) if you receive such marketing communications, the manner in which those marketing communications are received by you from the options available in your online Account (e.g., by physical mail or email). You can select or update your communication preferences directly in your online Account (which can be accessed from the Program Website or through the Unity App) or you can contact Unity Customer Care by telephone at
+1 (888) 519-6683
or by email at
customer_care@hardrock.com
.
Promotional Offers.
43. We may use your Personal Information to form a view on what we think you may want or need, or what may be of interest to you. This is how we decide which products, services or offers may be relevant for you, and based on that, we may send you promotional offers (we call this marketing).
44. You may receive certain marketing communications from us if you have requested information from us, or purchased goods or services from us, and you have not opted out of receiving marketing communications or if you have expressly agreed to receive marketing communications. Hard Rock offers our customers mobile marketing messages. See terms of use for this service by clicking
here
.
Third-Party Marketing.
45. In order to provide you with the highest level of products and services, we may share your Personal Information with carefully selected third parties, who may communicate directly with you. In some jurisdictions, data privacy laws may require us to obtain a separate consent before we do so. You can always choose whether to receive any or all of these communications by contacting us as described in this Privacy Policy. Alternatively, you can express your preference by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link contained within any applicable marketing email sent to you.
Communication Preferences.
46. You can change your marketing communication preferences (including stopping marketing communications) at any time by: (a) logging into your online Account (using the Program Website or the Unity App) and selecting or unselecting the relevant boxes; or (b) contacting us. Alternatively, you can request that marketing emails are no longer sent to you by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link contained within any applicable marketing email sent to you.
47. Please note that if you have requested that that marketing communications are no longer sent to you, you will still continue to receive communications from us: (a) in connection with the operation of the Program and your Account, and any changes thereof; and (b) any transactional information (such as details of any products or services requested or obtained from us).
48. If you have given us your consent to provide your Personal Information to third parties for marketing purposes, you may withdraw your consent at any time by: (a) completing and submitting the online form
Exercising My Rights
; or (b) by calling our toll-free number at
1-833-970-1536
.
49. Hard Rock offers our customers mobile marketing messages. See terms of use for this service by clicking
here
.
WHO WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION WITH AND WHY.
50. We may share your Personal Information with certain third parties and for specific purposes. The table below describes the recipients to whom we may disclose your Personal Information and for which purpose.
Recipients
Purpose for sharing Personal Information
Hard Rock Affiliated Parties, Participating Locations, and Marketing Brands.
For any of the purposes described in the Section headed “
Purpose of Processing and Types of Personal Information Processed
” in this Privacy Policy,
Service providers (e.g., providers of customer relationship management services, marketing services, customer financial services, including, but not limited to, rewards, payments, deposits, credit, and funding, cloud services and information technology services).
To support the Program, offers, promotions, and event management.
To support data analysis, Program Website development, Unity App development, and digital and physical marketing services.
To support the storage of Program information, and the storage of Member personal and transactional information.
To support the earning of Tier Credits, and the earning and redemption of Unity Points.
To fund accounts for Gaming Play.
Professional service providers (e.g., accountants and lawyers)
Where necessary to provide their professional services in the support of our business functions, any reviews, advice, compliance with the Program, or to protect our interests.
51. All the above categories exclude text messaging originator opt-in data and consent; this information will not be shared with any third parties.
52. We may disclose your Personal Information to third parties if necessary or appropriate: (a) to comply with Applicable Laws, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including authorities outside your country of residence and to meet national security or law enforcement requirements; (d) to enforce the Membership Terms; (e) to protect our operations, such as in the event of any reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets or stock; (f) to protect the rights, privacy, safety or property of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties, you or others; (g) to protect any tangible or intangible property of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties; (h) to allow us to pursue available remedies to protect our interests or those of our Members; and (i) to prevent or limit any damages that we may otherwise sustain.
53. We may also share your Personal Information with third parties to whom we may choose to sell, transfer or merge parts of our business or our assets. Alternatively, we may seek to acquire other businesses or merge with them. If a change happens to our business, then the new owners may use your Personal Information in the same way as set out in this Privacy Policy.
54. We may sell your Personal Information to third parties with whom we may partner in order: (a) to provide you with a better guest experience; or (b) for you to receive offers from those third parties that we believe may be of value to you. As of the effective date of this Privacy Policy, we have not sold any of your Personal Information.
HOW LONG DO WE KEEP YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION FOR?
55. We will only retain your Personal Information for as long as reasonably necessary for the purposes for which we collected the Personal Information, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, tax, accounting, or reporting requirements. We may retain your Personal Information for a longer period in the event of a complaint or if we reasonably believe there is a prospect of litigation in respect to our relationship with you.
56. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Information, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the Personal Information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Information, the purposes for which we Process your Personal Information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal, regulatory, tax, accounting, or other requirements. Notwithstanding, as a general policy, we do not retain Personal Information for longer than seven (7) years.
57. In some circumstances we will anonymise your Personal Information (so that it can no longer be associated with you) for historical research or statistical purposes, in which case we may use this information indefinitely without further notice to you.
58. When we no longer need to Process or retain your Personal Information, records, both physical and electronic, will be destroyed.
INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION.
59. As a global organization, we may internationally transfer your Personal Information we collect between the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties (including Hard Rock’s headquarters in the United States), Participating Locations, service providers, and third-party partners.
60. We may store and/or Process your Personal Information in the United States, or in Canada, or in other jurisdictions.
61. Some of the jurisdictions to which Personal Information is transferred may not provide the same level of privacy protection as your local jurisdiction. However, whenever we transfer your Personal Information outside of the European Economic Area (the “
EEA
”) or the United Kingdom (UK), we rely on the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (DPF) and the UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as described in the following section and, in the event of its future invalidation, we implement adequate safeguards in accordance with Applicable Laws in order to ensure a similar degree of protection as the country of origin.
EU-U.S. DATA PRIVACY FRAMEWORK (DPF) AND THE UK EXTENSION TO THE EU-U.S. DPF COMPLIANCE
62. Hard Rock participates in and complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), and the UK Extension of the EU-U.S. DPF as approved by the European Commission in its adequacy decision issued on July 10, 2023. Hard Rock complies with the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension DPF Principles, that were developed by the U.S. Department of Commerce in consultation with the European Commission in order to provide organizations in the United States with a reliable mechanism for personal information transfers to the United States from the EU and UK while ensuring that EU data subjects and UK data subjects continue to benefit from effective safeguards and protection as required by European legislation with respect to the processing of their personal information when they have been transferred to non-EU countries.
63. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension DPF Principles, the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension DPF Principles shall govern.
64. To learn more about the EU-U.S DPF and UK Extension DPF and view our certification, please visit the DPF website at
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search
.
65. Hard Rock commits to cooperate with the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) comply with the advice given by such authorities with regard to human resources data transferred from the EU and UK in the context of the employment relationship.
66. Hard Rock and the following U.S. subsidiaries comply with the EU-U.S. and UK Extension DPF Principles:
Boardwalk 1000, LLC
Hard Rock Cafe International (STP), Inc.
Hard Rock Cafe International (Hollywood), Inc.
Hard Rock Cafe International (Orlando), Inc.
Hard Rock Cafe Merchandise, Inc.
Hard Rock Casino Cincinnati, LLC
Hard Rock Hotel Licensing, Inc.
Seminole Hard Rock Support Services, LLC
Hard Rock Sacramento FM, LLC
Seminole Hard Rock Digital, LLC
Seminole Hard Rock Entertainment, Inc.
Spectacle Gary Holding, LLC
67. In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Hard Rock commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your Personal Information.
68. If you have any question or complaint regarding our participation in the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension of the EU-U.S. DPF or the processing of your Personal Information you may contact us as indicated below in the section of this Privacy Policy “HOW TO CONTACT US”.
DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ARBITRATION
69. When other dispute resolution avenues are exhausted, you may invoke the binding arbitration. Hard Rock Cafe International (USA), Inc. has provided a private sector independent recourse mechanism (located in the United States) to investigate and expeditiously resolve individual complaints and disputes. This dispute mechanism will cover all Personal Information except for human resource data. For more information, visit the website for ICDR®/AAA®EU-U.S. DPF: International Centre for Dispute Resolution®, the international division of the American Arbitration Association® (ICDR/AAA) at
https://www.icdr.org/dpf
. The services of ICDR/AAA are provided at no cost to you.
70. Under certain limited conditions and as a last resort, the individual can invoke binding arbitration. The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Hard Rock’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF.
71. If Hard Rock transfers your Personal Information to a third party, we will ensure the third party is contractually obligated to process your Personal Information only for limited, specific purposes consistent with this policy, to apply the same level of protection to that data as the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and notify us if it makes a determination that it can no longer meet this obligation. Upon notice, Hard Rock will take reasonable and appropriate steps to stop and remediate unauthorized processing. In cases of onward transfer to third parties of Personal Information received pursuant to the EU-U.S. DPF, Hard Rock is potentially liable.
YOUR RIGHTS.
Overview.
72. Under applicable data protection laws, you have a number of rights in relation to the Personal Information that we hold about you. These rights might not apply in every circumstance. You can exercise your rights by contacting us at any time using the details set out in this Privacy Policy (see the Section headed, “
Our Contact Details
”).
73. The table in this Section sets out the rights that you have over your Personal Information. Please note that although we take your rights seriously, there may be some circumstances where we cannot comply with your request. For example, if complying with your request would put us in a position of non-compliance with our own legal or regulatory requirements. In these instances, we will let you know why we cannot satisfy your request.
YOUR RIGHTS
DESCRIPTION
Right of Access
This is commonly known as a “data subject access request”.  It entitles you to inquire whether we are processing your Personal Information, what type of Personal Information, how we process it, and also to receive a copy of the Personal Information we hold about you.
Right to Rectification
This right entitles you to request us to correct any incomplete or inaccurate Personal Information we may hold about you.
We always take care to ensure that the information we hold about you is accurate and where necessary, up to date. As part of the Membership Terms, you are required to provide complete and accurate information in connection with your enrolment and participation in the Program, and to update that information promptly if there are any changes or if it becomes inaccurate.
If you believe that there are any inaccuracies, discrepancies, or gaps in the information we hold about you, you may change your personal details anytime in your account profile on the Program Website or Unity App, or by contacting Unity Customer Care by telephone at
+1 (888) 519-6683
or by email at
customer_care@hardrock.com
.
Note that we may need to verify the accuracy of any new data you provide to us. As such, we may require you to send supporting documentation prior to allowing certain changes (e.g., any changes to your legal name).
Right to Erasure or Right to be Forgotten
This right entitles you, in certain circumstances, to ask us to delete or remove your Personal Information.  These circumstances include, for example:
where we no longer need your Personal Information for the original purpose we collected it for;
where you have exercised your right to withdraw consent;
where you have successfully exercised your Right to Object to processing; or
where we may have processed your information unlawfully or where we are required to erase your Personal Information to comply with local law.
Note, however, that we may not always be able to comply with your request of erasure.  While we will assess every request, there are other factors that we will need to take into consideration.  For example, we may be unable to erase your information if retention of your Personal Information is reasonably necessary to:
meet our legal obligations;
resolve disputes;
maintain security;
prevent fraud and abuse; or
enforce the Membership Terms.
We may also need to retain your Personal Information if required by gaming industry regulations, tax statutes, and other legal requirements (e.g., information on our guests who self-report; tax reporting documents; player winnings, and any statistics, reports or listings that are required to comply with Applicable Laws or protect Participating Locations).
Right to Restriction
This right entitles you to ask us to suspend the processing of your Personal Information in certain scenarios including the following:
if you want us to establish the accuracy of your Personal Information;
where our use of your Personal Information is unlawful, but you do not want us to erase it;
where you need us to hold the Personal Information even if we no longer require it as you need it to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or
where you have objected to our use of your Personal Information, but we need to verify whether we have overriding legitimate grounds to use it.
Right to Data Portability
This right entitles you to request the transfer of your Personal Information to you or to a third party in certain circumstances.
We will provide to you, or a third party you have chosen, your Personal Information in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format.  Note that this right only applies to processing carried out by automated means which you initially provided consent for us to use, or where we used the information to perform a contract with you.
Right to Object
This right entitles you to object to our processing of your Personal Information in certain circumstances.
In some cases, we may refuse your request to object to our processing of your Personal Information, for instance, when we have compelling legitimate grounds to process your Personal Information which outweighs any prejudice to your rights and freedoms.
With respect to direct marketing, you have certain controls over the extent to which we market to you, and you have the right to request that we stop sending you certain marketing messages at any time.  For information about how to let us know you do not want to receive certain marketing messages, see the Section entitled, “
Marketing Communications And Your Communication Preferences
”.
Please note that even if you exercise this right because you do not want to receive certain marketing messages, we may still send you Program, Account, and transactional related communications where necessary.
Right not to be subject to a decision based solely on Automated Decision-Making, including Profiling
We may use your Personal Information and share it with advertisers and advertising networks, analytics and search engine providers, social networking companies (i.e., Facebook), and rewards companies for the purpose of “profiling”, which includes evaluating your personal aspects to analyze or predict aspects concerning your economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behaviour, location, or movements and segmenting you into a group with other Members or other persons who have similar personal characteristics.  We may use this profiling to make automated decisions, meaning without human interference, to improve the efficiency of our marketing and to offer certain benefits to you or other persons based on this profiling.  You have the right to opt-out at any time of our sharing of your Personal Information in this way.
In addition, we may also use your Personal Information to generate a “lookalike audience” or similar audience of prospective customers through the platforms of advertisers and advertising networks, analytics and search engine providers, social networking companies (e.g., Facebook) and rewards companies.  This allows us to target advertisements to potential customers who appear to have shared interests or similar demographics to you (based on the platform’s own data).  By way of example, we do this by uploading a data list to Facebook that is encrypted and anonymized (i.e., you cannot be individually identified on the data list).  Facebook then matches the encrypted and anonymized data list against Facebook’s own customer base to generate the lookalike audience.  Facebook then deletes the data list we provided to them, and uses it for no other purpose. We do not have access to the identity of anybody in the lookalike audience generated from Facebook’s own customer base, unless they choose to click on the ads for our products and services.
74. You can exercise your rights described in this Privacy Policy by contacting us using the contact details set out in the Section entitled, “How to Contact Us”. As a security measure, we may need to verify your identity when we receive your request, and we may need you to provide valid proof of identification. In addition, we may also contact you to ask for more information about your request to help us with our response.
75. Note that if you exercise your rights over your Personal Information and have more than one account with us, you will need to instruct us on each account separately.
No Fee Usually Required.
76. You will not have to pay a fee to access your Personal Information (or to exercise any of your rights described in this Section). However, we may charge a reasonable fee if we, in our sole discretion, consider your request is unfounded, repetitive, or excessive. Alternatively, we may refuse to comply with your request.
Response Time.
77. We try to respond to all legitimate requests based on your rights described in this Privacy Policy within one (1) month. Occasionally it could take us longer than one (1) month if your request is particularly complex or you have made a number of requests. In this case, we will notify you and keep you updated.
THIRD-PARTY LINKS.
78. The Program Website and the Unity App may contain links to third-party websites, plug-ins, and applications (“
Third-Party Platforms
”) whose privacy policies may differ from ours.
79. Clicking on those links may allow third parties to collect or share Personal Information about you. If you leave the Program Website or Unity App, we encourage you to carefully read and understand the privacy policies issued by these Third-Party Platforms.
80. Please note that we do not control these Third-Party Platforms and are not responsible for their privacy policies, statements, and practices (even if you access such platforms using links from the Program Website or Unity App). We do not accept any responsibility or liability in respect of these Third-Party Platforms.
HOW WE KEEP YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION SECURE.
81. We use industry standard security safeguards to help protect Personal Information from unauthorized access, alteration, or disclosure. In addition, we limit access to your Personal Information to those employees, agents, contractors, service providers, and other third parties who have a business need to know. They will only Process your Personal Information on our instructions, and they are subject to a duty of confidentiality. Despite these efforts, please understand that as no system is perfect, we cannot guarantee that unauthorized access or theft of data will not occur, so you should exercise caution when transferring personal and other sensitive information over the Internet.
82. Please advise us immediately at
dataprotection@hardrock.com
of any incident involving the loss of or unauthorized access to or disclosure of Personal Information that is in our custody or control. We maintain Incident Response and Business Continuity Plans to address data incident situations.
83. You are responsible for keeping your Account Credentials confidential. You should not share such Account Credentials with any other person, as you are responsible for all activity on your Account. Be sure to sign off when finished if you are using a shared device. You must notify us immediately if you are aware or suspect any unauthorized use of your Account. Please note that we will never ask for a password other than on the log-in page on your Unity online account (which is accessible through the Program Website or the Unity App). Links are available on the Program Website and the Unity App to request assistance for logging into your online Account.
PROTECTING CHILDREN.
84. We are mindful of the privacy of children as they may be less aware of the risks, consequences and safeguards concerned, and their rights in relation to the processing of Personal Information. For these reasons, promotions, and activities by us addressed to children always receive specific attention and protection. We always rely on consent as a lawful basis for processing of Personal Information relating to children, and we always get consent from whoever holds custodial responsibility for the child.
UPDATES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY.
85. We reserve the right to update, change, revise, modify, amend, supplement, or replace this Privacy Policy (collectively, the “
Changes
”) at any time in our sole discretion by providing notice of the Changes by posting the revised Privacy Policy (incorporating the Changes) to the Program Website. In addition, we, in our sole discretion (unless required by Applicable Laws), may provide notice of the Changes by sending a copy of the revised Privacy Policy via email to Members. If you continue to access or use the Program Website or the Unity App, or continue to participate in the Program, after the revised Privacy Policy has been posted, or after receiving a copy of the revised Privacy Policy (incorporating the Changes) by email (if we choose to send you an email); then subject to Applicable Laws, you will be deemed to have accepted such Changes and the revised Privacy Policy shall become binding upon you as of the date that the revised Privacy Policy became effective. We therefore encourage you to review our Privacy Policy periodically for the most up-to-date information.
86. If you disagree with the revised Privacy Policy, then your sole and exclusive remedy is to withdraw from the Program and terminate your Membership in accordance with the Membership Terms.
U.S. STATE-SPECIFIC PRIVACY LAWS.
87. If you reside in U.S. States with comprehensive data privacy laws, then, in addition to the rights you have under this Privacy Policy, you are entitled to the additional disclosures and rights set out in the U.S State-Specific Privacy Laws depending on the particular State in which you reside. Please click this link
U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws
to see the additional disclosures and rights that apply to you. Please check the above link regularly for any updates that may apply to you or your place of residence.
HOW TO CONTACT US.
88.
Global Data Protection & Risk Office.
Our Global Data Protection & Risk Office is responsible for overseeing this Privacy Policy.  If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, or you wish to exercise any of your rights set out in the Section entitled “
Your Rights
” of this Privacy Policy, please: (1) contact our Global Data Protection & Risk Office by using the contact details below, or
(2) complete and submit the online form which can be accessed at the link below.
To:
Global Data Protection & Risk Office
Seminole Hard Rock Support Services, LLC d/b/a Unity Global Services
Postal address:
5701 Stirling Road,
Davie, Florida 33314
United States of America
Email address:
dataprotection@hardrock.com
Telephone number:
+1-833-970-1536
(U.S. toll-free); or
+1-954-498-9834
Website:
unity.hardrock.com
Online Form Link:
You can exercise any of your rights by submitting the online form
Exercising My Rights
89. Please include your first name, last name, address, phone number, email address, and any relevant account or reference number in all communications and state clearly the nature of your request or concern. If you wish to exercise your privacy rights mentioned in the Section entitled “Your Rights” of this Privacy Policy, please mention the name of the right you would like to exercise in the subject of your request. As a security measure, we may need to verify your identity when we receive your request, and we may need you to provide valid proof of identification. If we decline to take action regarding your request, we shall inform you of the justification for declining to take action and shall provide you with instructions on how to appeal our decision (you can appeal our decision by following those instructions).
90.
UK Contact Information.
For residents in the UK, please contact our UK Data Privacy Representative by using the following contact details:
To:
UK Unity Data Privacy
Postal address:
148 Old Park Lane,
London W1K IQY
United Kingdom
Email address:
dataprotection@hardrock.com
Telephone number:
+
44-020-7514-1700
91. You have the right to make a complaint at any time to the Information Commissioner’s Office (“
ICO
”), the UK regulator for data protection issues (
www.ico.org.uk
). We would, however, appreciate the chance to deal with your concerns before you approach the ICO, so we ask that you please contact us in the first instance.
92.
EEA Contact Information.
For residents of the EEA, please contact our EEA Data Privacy Representative by using the following contact details:
To:
EEA Unity Data Privacy
Studio Legale PANETTA
Postal address:
Via Arenula, 83
00186 Roma RM, Italy
Email address:
dataprotection@hardrock.co.it
Telephone number:
+
39-06-6821-0129
93. You have the right to make a complaint at any time with a supervisory authority based in the EEA; in particular, a supervisory authority in the EEA country of your habitual residence, place of work, or of an alleged infringement of data protection laws.
94. In all cases, we will do our best to answer any question and resolve any complaint to your satisfaction.
Appendix 1 (China)
This Appendix contains additional privacy provisions that, in addition to the Privacy Policy, apply within the borders of People’s Republic of China (PRC), excluding Hong Kong Special Administrative Region, Macau Special Administrative Region and Taiwan.
Mini-program
.  This Appendix to the Privacy Policy explains how we, the Program Website, and/or our WeChat Mini program (the "
Mini-program
") collect and otherwise process Personal Information. You may choose to submit Personal Information (such as your name, IDENTIFICATION CARD NUMBER, ADDRESS, e-mail address, birthdate, and telephone number) to us at a Participating Location, through the Program Website, or the Mini-program. We collect, store, use, process, transfer, provide, delete, or otherwise process Personal Information for providing services to you regarding the Program and other business purposes set out in the Privacy Policy only unless otherwise permitted by Applicable Laws. We will not share this information in ways different from what is disclosed in the Privacy Policy. If you have any questions about this Appendix, the Privacy Policy, the Website, or the Mini-program, please contact us at
dataprotection@hardrock.com
Personal Information Rights
.
Change or Correct
:  You can request that we change or correct your Personal Information. Among others, if you created an account with us, you can review and edit your Personal Information by logging onto the Website or the Mini-program and visiting your account. Please note that personal profile information supplied by you on the Website or the Mini-program can be accessed by you online at any time and no charge.
Withdrawing Consent
.  If we have collected or processed your Personal Information with your consent, you may withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect the processing of your Personal Information based on other lawful processing grounds.
Explanation
. You can request us to explain our Personal Information processing rules.
Access, correction, amendment, deletion.
If you request access, correction, amendment, or deletion of your Personal Information and you have more than one account with us, you will need to instruct us on each account separately. Reasonable access to Personal Information will generally be provided within thirty (30) calendar days at no cost to you, subject to limited exceptions prescribed by Applicable Laws or excessive requests.
Please note that we may need to retain certain Personal Information for recordkeeping purposes or to complete transactions that occurred prior to your request. We will also retain your Personal Information if reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations, meet regulatory requirements, resolve disputes, maintain security, prevent fraud and abuse, to the extent permissible by Applicable Laws.
Right not to provide information
.
You have the right not to provide Personal Information. However, if you elect not to provide the necessary Personal Information as described above, you may not be able to utilize some or all of the Program services.
Sensitive Information
.
THE PPERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT AND PROCESS MAY CONTAIN SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION. THE INFORMATION WE COLLECT AND WHICH MIGHT BE DEEMED AS SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION IS IN UPPERCASE IN THE PRIVACY POLICY FOR YOUR SPECIAL ATTENTION, INCLUDING YOUR IDENTIFICATION CARD NUMBER, ADDRESSES, PAYMENT INFORMATION, GEOLOCATION, THE PERSONAL INFORMATION OF YOUR CHILDREN UNDER 14 YEARS OLD, ETC. In each case, we will make sure that the processing of your sensitive Personal Information is for specific purposes as described in the Privacy Policy and is necessary; we will take strict security measures when processing the sensitive Personal Information and such processing will be conducted in a manner having the least impact on your personal rights and interests.
YOU EXPRESSLY AND VOLUNTARILY CONSENT TO THE PROCESSING BY US OF YOUR SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION FOR THE PURPOSES AND IN THE MANNER DESCRIBED IN THE PRIVACY POLICY.
Data Sharing and Transfers
.
In addition, to the extent permissible under Applicable Laws of China, we may share your Personal Information to local, state, federal, and foreign countries as mandated by their reporting requirements; and governmental authorities to comply with legal, regulatory, or administrative requirements, or as otherwise required by the U.S. or other law. In such case, we will notify you of the name and contact information of the foreign recipients, their information processing purposes and methods and the types of Personal Information processed by them and other information, to the extent required under applicable law. We may also disclose your Personal Information where necessary to prevent actual or suspected loss or harm to persons or property, or as otherwise permitted by law.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://urldefense.com/v3/__https://policies.google.com/privacy__;!!BeC6CIU!IFrU7kDGqfWS5KqqIlXTuA2aGzAxbTtqv9veq8k7nmi81qVL-UtJJpPNZBKUF33F9czlMmQxetGdVwid7ddBzboU5ck$:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://urldefense.com/v3/__https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search__;!!BeC6CIU!IFrU7kDGqfWS5KqqIlXTuA2aGzAxbTtqv9veq8k7nmi81qVL-UtJJpPNZBKUF33F9czlMmQxetGdVwid7ddBXH9YExw$:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 2
https://unity.hardrock.com/us-state-specific-privacy-laws:
U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws
Published Date: April 19, 2022
Effective Date: April 19, 2022
INTRODUCTION
This U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws
is provided in connection with the Unity by Hard Rock™ loyalty program, which is also known as Unity™ or as Unity by Seminole Gaming™ (collectively, the “
Program
”).
This U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws applies to residents of:
California;
Nevada; and
Virginia.
This U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws forms part of the Unity by Hard Rock Privacy Policy located at
unitybyhardrock.com/privacy-policy
(the “
Privacy Policy
”), and must be read in conjunction with all of the Sections of the Privacy Policy. Unless the context otherwise requires, words or terms used in this U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws, shall have the same meaning as defined in the Privacy Policy.
If you reside in California, Nevada or Virginia, then, in addition to the rights you have under the Privacy Policy, you are entitled to the additional disclosures and rights set out in the respective Sections below.
NOTICE FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS.
In addition to the rights described in the Privacy Policy, in accordance with the California Consumer Privacy Act effective as of January 1, 2020 (“CCPA”), California residents are entitled to exercise the following rights:
The right to request disclosure.  You may request us to disclose: (i) the categories of Personal Information we have collected about you; (ii) what specific Personal Information we have collected about you; (iii) the categories of sources from which such Personal Information is collected; (iv) the purpose for which we collect or sell such Personal Information; (v) the categories of third parties with whom we share such Personal Information; (vi) the categories of Personal Information that we sell or disclose to third parties; and (vii) whether such Personal Information has been sold or disclosed to third parties in the twelve (12) preceding months;
The right to request the deletion of your Personal Information collected by us;
The right to opt-out of the sale and/or sharing of your Personal Information to third parties; and
The right to non-discrimination for exercising any of the privacy rights under the CCPA as mentioned in this Section.  Members who exercise their rights provided under the CCPA (e.g., the right to request disclosure, to request deletion, and to opt-out of the sale and/or sharing of Personal Information) may do so without any effect on their Membership status or eligibility to receive Program Benefits, and Members who exercise their privacy rights under the CCPA are eligible to receive the same benefits as Members who do not.
You may also designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf.  Such authorized agent must be registered with the California Secretary of State.  Please be aware that we may deny a request from an agent who does not submit valid proof of authorization to act on your behalf.
In compliance with the CCPA requirements, we acknowledge that, as of the effective date of this U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws, the following:
we have not collected your Personal Information under the Program in the preceding twelve (12) months, except as described in the Privacy Policy, or as described in this U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws, or as disclosed to you at the time of collection;
we have not sold your Personal Information to third parties under the Program in the preceding twelve (12) months; however, we might sell your Personal Information in the future under the Program; and
we have not shared your Personal Information with third parties for business purposes during the preceding twelve (12) months, except as described in the Privacy Policy, this U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws, or as disclosed to you at the time of collection.
We collect and share the following categories of Personal Information: (a) Identifiers, such as your name, address, email, phone number, account number or other similar identifiers; (b) Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records Statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)); (c) Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law, such as age, gender, religion, and disability information; (d) commercial information, such as your use of our products or services; (e) Biometric information, such as finger prints; (f) Internet or other similar network activity, such as your IP address or browser or device information; (g) Geolocation data, such as information about your physical location collected from geolocation features on your device, including your IP address; (h) Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information, such as pictures or video of you; (i) Professional or employment-related information, such as your employer, job title, function and nature of your job, duties, and responsibilities; and (j) Inferences drawn from other Personal Information to create  profiles. The types of Personal Information we collect and share falling within the above categories is set out in
Section 40
of the Privacy Policy.
You have the right to opt-out of the sale and/or sharing your Personal Information for business purposes (the “right to opt-out”).  You may exercise your right to opt-out by using one of the contact methods described in
Section 26
below.
A “sale” of Personal Information is defined under CCPA as “selling, renting, releasing disclosing, disseminating, making available, transferring, or otherwise communicating orally, in writing, or by electronic or other means, a consumer’s Personal Information by the business to another business or a third party for monetary or other valuable consideration”.
If you exercise your opt-out right, you may opt back into the sale or sharing of your Personal Information for business purposes at any time by using one of the contact methods described in
Section 26
below.  Upon any exercise of your opt-out right, we will wait at least twelve (12) months before asking you to opt back in to reauthorize the sale or sharing of your Personal Information for business purposes.
If you are sixteen (16) years of age or older, you have the right to opt-out at any time (the “right to opt-out”).  We do not sell the Personal Information of consumers we actually know are less than sixteen (16) years of age, unless we receive affirmative authorization (the “right to opt-in”) from either:  (a) the consumer who is at least thirteen (13) years of age but not yet sixteen (16) years of age; or (b) the parent or guardian of a consumer less than thirteen (13) years of age.  Consumers who opt‑in to the sale and/or sharing of Personal Information for business purposes, may opt-out of a future sale and/or sharing of Personal Information for business purposes at any time. You may opt-out or opt-in by using one of the contact methods described in
Section 26
below.
NOTICE FOR NEVADA RESIDENTS.
In addition to the rights described in the Privacy Policy, Nevada residents are entitled to exercise their rights to review and request changes to their Personal Information collected by us under the Nevada Revised Statutes Ch.603A (the “Nevada Privacy Law”). You may exercise your rights by using one of the contact methods described in
Section 26
below.
The categories of your Personal Information processed by us are set out in
Section 8
of this U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws.
The categories of third parties we share Personal Information with is set out in
Sections 50
through
53
of the Privacy Policy.
In the course of business, we might sell your Personal Information during the term of the Program.  If you wish to opt-out of sales of your Personal Information, you can do so at any time by using one of the contact methods described in
Section 26
below.
A “sale” of Personal Information is defined by the Nevada Privacy Law, as amended by SB 260, as the “exchange of covered information for monetary consideration by an operator or data broker to another person”.
NOTICE FOR VIRGINIA RESIDENTS.
In addition to the rights described in the Privacy Policy, if you are a Virginia resident you shall have those additional rights conferred by the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (the “Virginia Privacy Law”), which becomes effective on January 1, 2023.
The categories of your Personal Information processed by us are set out in
Section 8
of this U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws.
The purpose for processing your Personal Information is set out in
Section 40
of the Privacy Policy.
The categories of your Personal Information we share with third parties is set out in
Section 8
of this U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws.
The categories of third parties, with whom we share your Personal Information are set out in
Sections 50
through
53
of the Privacy Policy.
We process your Personal Information for targeted advertising as set out in
Sections 42
through
46
of the Privacy Policy.
Under Virginia Privacy Law we are required to comply with an authenticated request from you (as a Virginia resident) to exercise the right:
to confirm whether or not we are processing your Personal Information and to access such Personal Information;
to correct inaccuracies in your Personal Information, taking into account the nature of the Personal Information and the purposes of the processing of your Personal Information;
to delete Personal Information provided by or obtained about you;
to obtain a copy of your Personal Information that you previously provided to us in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows you to transmit the data to another controller without hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means; and
to opt-out of the processing of Personal Information for purposes of (i) targeted advertising, (ii) the sale of Personal Information, or (iii) profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning you.
You may exercise your rights by using one of the contact methods described in
Section 26
below.
OUR CONTACT DETAILS.
Global Data Protection & Risk Office.
If you have any questions about this U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws, or you wish to exercise any of your rights set out above please:
(1) contact our Global Data Protection & Risk Office by using the contact details below, or
(2) complete and submit the relevant online form which can be accessed at the link below.
To:
Global Data Protection & Risk Office
Seminole Hard Rock Support Services, LLC d/b/a Unity Global Services
Postal address:
5701 Stirling Road,
Davie, Florida 33314
United States of America
Email address:
dataprotection@hardrock.com
Telephone number:
+1-833-970-1536 (U.S. toll-free); or
+1-954-498-9834
Website:
unitybyhardrock.com
ONLINE FORM LINK:
TO EXERCISE YOUR RIGHT TO OPT-OUT OR OPT-IN:
To exercise your right to opt-out or opt-in to the sale/sharing of your Personal Information please complete and submit the online form
Do Not Sell My Personal Information
.
TO EXERCISE
                ANY OF YOUR OTHER RIGHTS:
To exercise any of your other rights (other than your right to opt-out or opt-in to the sale/sharing of your Personal Information) please complete and submit the online form
Exercising My Other Rights
.
Please include your first name, last name, address, phone number, email address, and any relevant account or reference number in all communications and state clearly the nature of your request or concern.  If you wish to exercise your privacy rights mentioned in this U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws, please mention the name of the right you would like to exercise in the subject of your request.
As a security measure, we may need to verify your identity when we receive your request, and we may need you to provide valid proof of identification. If we decline to take action regarding your request, we shall inform you of the justification for declining to take action and shall provide you with instructions on how to appeal our decision (you can appeal our decision by following those instructions).
Cookies are small files stored on your browser. We use cookies to analyze and enhance the usage of our website (“Performance Cookies”) or to provide you with customized content based on the preference you saved on our website (“Functional Cookies”) and we may share data with our advertising partners to build profiles about you to show you relevant ads (“Targeting Cookies”). Click on “Cookies Settings” to set your preferences.
Privacy Policy
Cookies Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are set by a range of social media services that we have added to the site to enable you to share our content with your friends and networks. They are capable of tracking your browser across other sites and building up a profile of your interests. This may impact the content and messages you see on other websites you visit.    If you do not allow these cookies you may not be able to use or see these sharing tools.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 3
https://unity.hardrock.com/privacy-policy:
English
Arabic
Azerbaijani
Catalan
Chinese - Simplified
Chinese - Traditional
Croatian
Czech
Dutch
French
German
Greek
Hungarian
Indonesian
Italian
Japanese
Malaysian
Polish
Portuguese (Portugal)
Romanian
Russian
Spanish
Thai
Vietnamese
English
Loading...
UNITY™ BY HARD ROCK PRIVACY POLICY
Last Update: August 23, 2024
INTRODUCTION
1. This Privacy Policy is administered by Seminole Hard Rock Support Services, LLC, d/b/a HR Unity Global Services, 5701 Stirling Road, Davie, Florida 33314, United States of America (the “
Program Manager
”) on behalf of Hard Rock Affiliated Parties.
2. This Privacy Policy applies and governs when you:
access or use the Unity Program Website (the “
Program Website
”) at
unity.hardrock.com
;
download, access, or use the mobile application made available by us in connection with the Program; or
use our products or services in relation to, or in connection with, the Program.
3. This Privacy Policy explains how we may collect, use and share (collectively, “
Process
”) your Personal Information in relation to, and in connection with, the Unity by Hard Rock loyalty program, which is also known as Unity™ or as Unity by Seminole Gaming™ (collectively, the “
Program
”).
4. This Privacy Policy also provides information about your rights with respect to your Personal Information and how you can contact us if you have any concern or questions about your Personal Information.
5. The Program Manager is the data controller of your Personal Information under the Program. This means, in relation to the Program, that the Program Manager has overall say and control over the reason and purposes behind the collection of your Personal Information and the means and method of any processing of your Personal Information.
6. When you visit the Program Website, use the Unity App, use any product, service, or benefit of the Program, or interact with us, and provide your Personal Information to us, your Personal Information will be processed in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
7. You acknowledge that we shall, in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Policy, use any Personal Information already held or obtained in connection with, or as a result of, you being a member of, or participating in, a pre-existing rewards or loyalty program, including, without limitation, any one or more of the following rewards or loyalty programs: (i) Seminole Wild Card; (ii) Hard Rock Rewards; (iii) Wild Card Rewards; or (iv) Hard Rock Casino Northern Indiana Loyalty Program.
8. We may collect certain Personal Information about you to provide you with the services, features and benefits of the Program and also to facilitate our relationship with you in connection with the Program. Providing Personal Information is optional. You may choose not to provide the requested Personal Information; however, you may not be able to access and use some or all of the features or benefits of the Program for which your Personal Information is required.
9. We may update this Privacy Policy at any time, and any updates to this Privacy Policy will be effective on the date specified in the updated Privacy Policy.
10. Where additional detailed information is needed to explain our privacy practices, we will provide such information in supplementary privacy notices.
11. This Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected by any third party, including, but not limited to, a third-party website, third-party applications, or third-party advertising that may link to or be accessible from or on the Program Website or the Unity App. Please review the privacy policies of any third-party website or application for more information about how they process your Personal Information.
12. This Privacy Policy is provided in a layered format so you can click through to the specific sections of this Privacy Policy. Alternatively, you may view and/or download a Portable Document Format (.pdf) version of this Privacy Policy
here
.
Definitions
13. In this Privacy Policy, the following words shall have the following meanings:
"Account"
means an account assigned to a Member under the Program for the recording of Tier Credits, Unity Points, and if appropriate, other Program Benefits of that Member, as well as other relevant Member information.
"Account Credentials"
means in relation to a Member: (a) the unique Account number allocated to that Member or their email address; and (b) the password selected by that Member to access their Account.
"Additional Terms"
means the additional terms and conditions, rules, and policies, which apply to the Program, such as those applicable to the earning and redemption of Unity Points, that may be posted on the Program Website at
unity.hardrock.com
.
"Applicable Laws"
means any and all laws, ordinances, constitutions, regulations, statutes, treaties, rules, codes, permits, principles of common law, requirements, and orders adopted, enacted, implemented, promulgated, issued, entered, or deemed applicable by or under the authority of any governmental body having jurisdiction over you, the Program, the Program Manager, or any Hard Rock Affiliated Parties, in any way.
"Approved Identification"
means a valid and unexpired government-issued photo identification (e.g., driver’s license, passport, state identification card, or military identification) or other types of identification that may be accepted by Management in its sole discretion.
"Excluded Purchase"
means any of the following expenditures:
the purchase or redemption of any gift cards issued by any of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties;
Non-Qualifying Stays and bookings at packaged rates or discounted or promotional items that are specifically excluded (or if excluded in part, then the excluded part) from the Program;
the purchase of tickets to Hard Rock entertainment events or live events at Participating Locations unless specifically designated as eligible for Unity Points;
purchases at any location that is not a Participating Location;
purchases at non-participating third-party restaurants, retail stores, or other services, including, but not limited to third-party food delivery services (e.g., DoorDash, Grubhub, Uber Eats, etc.), even if located within a Participating Location;
purchases not paid for directly by the Member (e.g., restaurant charges that are billed to a Member’s room and are paid for by a Member’s employer);
group events (i.e., weddings, meetings, receptions, and group menu-based events);
sales, use or personal federal, state, or local taxes, including, but not limited to, VAT and GST;
gratuities; and
any products or services for which it is illegal or prohibited under any Applicable Laws to issue or redeem Unity Points or other Program Benefits.
crew room rate, at a business, employee or friends and family rate,
"Game Play"
means slot machine, other electronic gaming machine, table game play, online gaming, bingo, poker, keno, race and sports betting, social gaming play, or other gaming activities as may be offered at a Participating Location subject to Applicable Laws.
"Hard Rock Affiliated Parties"
means any entity that is an affiliate of or is controlled by, under the control of, under common control with, or managed by, the Program Manager, as well as any Participating Location, or any franchisee or licensee that is operating a Participating Location. For purposes of this definition, “control”, “controlled by”, “under common control with” means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of such entity, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by agreement, or otherwise.
"Management"
means the management of the Participating Location.
"Marketing Brands"
means the following brands:
Hard Rock®;
Hard Rock Cafe®;
Hard Rock Casino®;
Hard Rock Hotel;
Hard Rock Hotel & Casino®;
Hard Rock Digital®;
Rock Shop®;
Seminole Gaming®;
Reverb®; and
Reverb by Hard Rock®.
and any such other brands, trademarks, or trade names used by any of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties for marketing purposes.
"Member"
means a registered member of the Program.
"Membership"
means your enrollment and participation in the Program in accordance with the Membership Terms.
"Membership Terms"
means the Unity By Hard Rock™ Loyalty Program Terms and Conditions and any Additional Terms and any changes to them.
"Non-Gaming Items"
means non-gaming activities, products, or services, including, but not limited to, hotel, cafe, spa, food and beverage, bar, nightclub, live events, retail shop, offered by a Participating Location.
"Non-Qualifying Stay"
means any stay at a Participating Location that is not a Qualifying Stay and includes, but is not limited to, any stay that is:
booked through: (i) tour operators, (ii) vacation clubs or similar programs, (iii) online channels, or other third party channels (irrespective of rate paid), including, but not limited to, expedia.com, trip.com, hotwire.com, priceline.com, orbitz.com, booking.com, travelocity.com, or (iv) third-party branded booking engines (including but not limited to ReservHotel, Despegar, Tripset) that allow package reservations (e.g., combination of hotel with flight, car rental, etc.);
booked through any “opaque” channel where the Marketing Brand may or may not be known at the time of purchase;
booked at a wholesaler or contracted rate where the Member does not directly pay the Participating Location;
greater than thirty (30) consecutive days whereby the first thirty (30) days are deemed a Qualifying Stay but any additional days beyond thirty (30) consecutive days for a stay would not qualify;
provided on a complimentary basis; or
voucher or third-party award redemptions.
"Participating Location"
means any location, outlet, or website participating in the Program, including, but not limited to, participating Seminole Casinos, Seminole Hard Rock Hotel & Casinos, Hard Rock Casinos, Reverb Hotels, Hard Rock Cafe restaurant locations, and Rock Shops. A current list of Participating Locations is provided on the Program Website.
"Personal Information"
means any information relating to an identified or identifiable individual; an identifiable individual is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or to one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural or social identity of that natural person.
"Privacy Policy"
means this privacy policy and any Changes.
"Program Benefits"
means Tier Credits, Unity Points, together with any other Program benefits described on the Program Website.
"Qualifying Spend"
means any purchase of any product or service at a Participating Location that is eligible to earn Tier Credits and Unity Points as set forth on the Program Website, or at a Participating Location, including Game Play and Non Gaming Items, but not including Excluded Purchases.
"Qualifying Stay"
means a stay at a Participating Location (excluding a Non-Qualifying Stay) booked directly through: (a) a Marketing Brand’s central reservation office, website or mobile application; (b) a Participating Location; or (c) an authorized travel agent; or (d) an approved channel, at: (i) public rates; or (ii) non-public rates (where under the applicable booking contract, the booking is deemed to be eligible to earn Tier Credits and Unity Points on all or part of the booking). For the avoidance of doubt, non-public rates may include discounted rates such as advanced purchase rates, group rates, corporate negotiated rates, and government rates.
"Tier Credits"
means those credits issued to a Member’s Account that are used solely to determine the applicable Unity Tier for a Member each year, and are non redeemable, cannot be converted to cash, or cannot be used towards any purchase.
"Unity App"
means the mobile application made available by the Program Manager in connection with the Program.
"Unity Card"
means an authorized card issued by the Program Manager to the Member under the Program either in physical or digital form (including, without limitation, digital card functionality within the Unity App).
"Unity Points"
means points credited to a Member’s Account as a result of a Qualifying Spend that the Member can, subject to Applicable Laws (and any rules of the relevant Participating Location), redeem for permitted merchandise or services, or towards permitted purchases at a Participating Location.
"Unity Tier"
means a tier of the Program available to a Member (with associated Program Benefits) based on Tier Credits earned by that Member as set forth on the Program Website.
"We", "we", "Our" "our", "Us", or "us"
means the Program Manager.
"You", "you", "Your", or "your"
means you as a Member (or potential Member) of the Program.
14. In this Privacy Policy, a reference to “Section” or “section” is a reference to a Section of this Privacy Policy; and words importing the singular include the plural and vice versa.
WHEN AND HOW DO WE COLLECT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION.
15. We may collect your Personal Information directly from you when you:
access or use the Program Website;
download, access or use the Unity App;
register to become a Member of the Program and create your Account;
change your personal details in your Account profile on the Program Website, the Unity App, or by contacting Unity Customer Care;
participate in the Program, including earning Tier Credits, Unity Points, receiving other Program Benefits or other offers or promotions;
receive Tier Credits;
receive and redeem Unity Points;
receive additional Program Benefits that may apply to you;
use your Unity Card for Game Play;
perform, manage, view your transactions in connection with the Program on your Account;
use your Account to make a reservation or booking at a restaurant, hotel, or any other activity (e.g., a concert, show tickets, tours);
apply for a digital wallet;
purchase or sell any virtual goods or items;
use any of our products or services at a location that accepts our products or services (such as a co-branded payment device or credit card);
enter a contest, promotional program, or survey launched or sponsored by the Program;
participate in a Program event or an event sponsored by the Program;
contact Unity Customer Care;
contact us by letter, email, telephone, text, chat, or through any other written and verbal communications (digital or otherwise);
request information about our products or services, a Participating Location, the Program Website, the Unity App, or the Program;
you request marketing information or other promotional material to be sent to you;
allow someone to act on your behalf to provide us your Personal Information, including for a reservation at a restaurant or for a hotel booking;
connect with us via social media or you post content on Unity social page or a third-party social media website in connection with the Program; or
interact with us or our staff during your visit to a Participating Location, or during the use of digital or online services that we provide.
16. We may also collect your Personal Information indirectly from publicly available sources and third parties, including, but not limited to, the following:
public databases, joint marketing partners, or other third parties;
organizations which provide credit information and credit references;
organizations involved in fraud prevention and detection;
family and friends (for example, when a family member or friend checks into a hotel room on your behalf), or a travel agent, or an employer who makes reservations on your behalf;
companies with whom we partner to provide you with goods, services, or offers based on your activities or experiences at a Participating Location;
one of our Marketing Brands;
Internet-connected devices and our networks available at Participating Locations. For example, if you connect a device to the hotel’s Internet, we may tailor information or services offered to you for a better experience; and
organizations or services that share information with us that is permissible under their own privacy policy (such as our marketing partners or social media platforms).
COOKIES AND OTHER AUTOMATED TECHNOLOGIES.
17. As you interact with the Program Website or the Unity App, we will automatically collect technical data about your equipment, browsing actions, and patterns. We collect this information by using cookies and other automated technologies as described in Sections 19 through 39. We may also receive technical data about you if you visit other websites employing our cookies. We may use such information to analyze the use of the Program Website and improve its features and performance to provide you with a better browsing experience.
(a) Cookies.
18. The Program Website uses “cookies” to help us understand which parts of the Program Website are the most popular and the preferences of Program Website users. We may also use cookies to study traffic patterns on the Program Website, to improve its functionality and usability, to improve the effectiveness of our communications with users, to customize your experience, and to provide greater convenience to you during your interactions with the Program Website.
19. A cookie is a unique alphanumeric identifier that websites use to help identify the number of unique visitors to a website, whether or not those visitors are repeat visitors, and the source of the visits. If you prefer to disable cookies, you may do so through your web browser’s security settings. Please note that certain features of the Program Website may not be available once cookies have been disabled.
20. We may use two types of cookies: (i) Session cookies; and (ii) Persistent Cookies. Session Cookies and Persistent Cookies are categorized as: (a) Strictly Necessary Cookies; (b) Performance Cookies; (c) Functional Cookies; and (d) Targeting Cookies.
21.
Session Cookies
. Session cookies exist only during an online session. They disappear from your device when you close your browser or turn off your device. We use session cookies to allow our systems to uniquely identify you during a session or while you are visiting the Program Website. If you have logged into your Account, this allows us to process your online transactions and requests, and verify your identity as you navigate through the various online pages. If you have disabled your Session Cookies as a guest without logging into your Account, your choice will only be effective for that single session, and you will need to opt-out again.
22.
Persistent Cookies
. Persistent cookies remain on your computer after you have closed your browser or turned off your device.
23.
Strictly Necessary Cookies
. Strictly Necessary Cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. Strictly Necessary Cookies do not store any Personal Information.
24.
Performance Cookies
. Performance Cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of the Program Website. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the Program Website. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow Performance Cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and we will not be able to monitor its performance.
25.
Functional Cookies
. Functional Cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third-party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow Functional Cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
26.
Targeting Cookies
. Targeting Cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. Targeting Cookies do not store directly Personal Information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
(b) Clear GIFs or Web Beacons.
27. Clear GIFs (also known as web beacons, web bugs, or pixel tags) are tiny graphics with a unique identifier, similar in function to cookies. In contrast to cookies, which are stored on your device’s internal storage, clear GIFs are embedded invisibly on web pages. We may use clear GIFs in connection with the Program to, among other things, track the activities of Program Website visitors, help us manage content, and compile statistics about Program Website usage.
28. We and our service providers also use clear GIFs in HTML emails to our guests, to help us track email response rates, identify when our emails are viewed, and track whether our emails are forwarded.
29. Some of our email communications to you may contain links to content on the Program Website. When you click one of these links, it passes information through the Program Website web server before you arrive at the destination web page. We track this click-through data to help determine interest in particular topics and measure the effectiveness of our communications.
30. If you prefer not to be tracked, simply avoid clicking text or graphic links in emails you receive from us. In addition, you may view and change your preferences at any time by using the ‘Privacy Settings’ in your web browser.
(c) Server Log Files.
31. The Program Website gathers certain information automatically and stores it in log files. This information includes internet protocol (
“IP”
) addresses, browser type, operating system, internet service provider (
“ISP”
), referring/exit pages, date/time stamp of access, and clickstream data, and information about the content you view on the Program Website. When you visit the Program Website, the servers automatically log your IP address, the time and duration of your visit, and the time and duration spent on the pages of the Program Website which you view. If you arrive at the Program Website by clicking a paid advertisement or a link in a communication, then the server will capture information that tracks your visit from that link. If you arrive at the Program Website by clicking on a non-paid source, such as a search engine result or link on another website, the server captures information that tracks your visit from that source, to the extent available. The server also captures information from direct traffic. The server log files are not analyzed with respect to individuals.
(d) Geolocation.
32. If you have provided permission (opt-in) through the Unity App on your mobile device to allow us to collect location information, we may obtain your physical location information from technologies like GPS, Wi-Fi, or cell tower proximity. We may use the geolocation features and geolocation information that is collected to provide you with information regarding Participating Locations, events, and promotional offers in, or near, your area or current location.
33. You are able to withdraw your permission for us to acquire physical location information from your mobile device through your mobile device settings at any time. If you have questions about how to disable your mobile device's location services, we recommend you contact your mobile device service provider or the mobile device manufacturer.
(e) Do Not Track Signals.
34. Currently, our systems do not recognize browser “do-not-track” requests. You may, however, disable certain tracking as discussed in the Cookies Section of this Privacy Policy (e.g., by disabling cookies). Please note that we do not collect, and are not aware of third parties that collect, Personal Information from users of the Program Website, or about their online activities on third party websites.
(f) Third-Party Analytics.
35. We use automated devices and applications, such as Google Analytics, to evaluate usage of the Program Website, Unity Apps, and our online services. You can learn about Google’s practices by clicking on
https://policies.google.com/privacy
, and you may opt out by downloading the Google Analytics opt-out browser. The server also captures information from direct traffic. We use these tools to help us improve the Program Website, Unity Apps, our online services, and your user experiences. These devices and applications may use cookies, tracking pixels, and other tracking technologies to perform their functions. We do not share your Personal Information with these third parties.
(g) Unity App.
36. When you download or register to use the Unity App, you may submit Personal Information to us such as your name, email address, phone number, username, password, and other registration information.
37. Further, when you use the Unity App, we may collect certain information automatically, including technical information related to your mobile device, your device's unique identifier, your mobile network information, the type of mobile browser you use, and information about the way you use the Unity App.
38. Only after you have consented to such collection, we may also collect information stored on your device, including contact information, geolocation information or other digital content.
PURPOSE OF PROCESSING PERSONAL INFORMATION & THE TYPES OF PERSONAL INFORMATION PROCESSED.
39. The table below sets out: (i) the purpose of processing activity; and (ii) the types of Personal Information that we may collect and Process.
Purpose of Processing Activity
Types of Personal Information Processed
To register you as a Member.
To register you as a Member of the Program.  This will include an assessment of your eligibility to become a member of the Program.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account Credentials including, where relevant, Personal Identification Number (“
PIN
”) for your Account.
Approved Identification.
To operate the Program.
To operate the Program which includes collecting and processing your Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points at Participating Locations.
Account number and/or other validating information, and if required, your PIN for verification purposes.
Details of your Qualifying Spend.
Redemption of Unity Points.
To assess your entitlements.
To assess your entitlement to Program Benefits.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account number.
Approved Identification.
Details of your Qualifying Spend.
Program Benefits already awarded to your Account and the redemption or use of any of those Program Benefits.
Other transactions which may appear in your Account.
Information we consider relevant in relation to any irregular activity and/or necessary to monitor compliance with the Membership Terms.
To inform you of changes.
To inform you of changes to the Program, Membership Terms, Privacy Policy, your Account status, your Unity Tier, your Unity Points, Program Benefits, and any other Program related information.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account number.
Approved Identification.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
To make better Program offerings to you.
To better service your Membership and your preferences, by analyzing your transactions and identifying existing Program products or services that may be of interest to you, or could be added as additional products or services to the Program.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account number.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
To offer you additional products or services outside of the Program.
To offer you additional products and/or services from Hard Rock Affiliated Parties that are outside the Program or to offer you products or services from select reputable companies with whom we have a strategic relationship with because we believe their offerings may be of interest to you.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
To render products and/or services.
To provide, deliver, charge, and evaluate products and/or services utilized by you at a Participating Location.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of Qualifying Spend and redemption of Unity Points.
Responding to your requests.
Responding to your requests in respect of services, information, data, and concierge services.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
Details of the request.
For communication purposes.
To send you printed or digital communications regarding: your application to join the Program, your Membership, operation of the Program, to inform you of any changes to the Program or your Membership, to make Program offers to you, to offer you additional products or services, to render products or services to you, and to respond to your requests.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Relevant Account details.
For market research.
To send you periodic satisfaction, quality of service or market research surveys.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Date of birth.
Marital status.
Number of children and their ages.
Your opinions/answers.
To enable you to participate in competitions and win prizes.
To enable you to take part in a prize draw, sweepstakes, contests or competitions, including administering your participation in the same, and to notify winners and award prizes, or facilitate an event.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details relevant to your participation in the activity.
For credit applications.
To review and evaluate a credit application that is submitted to us for approval.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Details of transactions appearing in your Account.
Relevant identifier information to enable us to run a credit check (e.g., SSN).
Financial information that you have submitted to us.
For identification purposes.
To use certain pieces of Personal Information to verify your identity which may be required in respect of providing certain information, or making certain updates or changes to your Account, or for redemptions.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Your PIN.
Date of birth.
Approved Identification.
Business governance.
To administer and protect our business, the Program, the Program Website and Unity App (including troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, system maintenance, support, reporting and hosting of data).
Your Account and any transactions therein.
Web content and advertising.
To deliver relevant website content or Unity App content and advertisements to you and to measure or understand the effectiveness of the advertising we serve to you.
Information relating to the browsing or use of the Program Website and use of the Unity App.
Responses to marketing emails and advertisements.
For safety reasons.
Provide for the safety and security of staff, Members, guests, and other visitors.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Approved Identification.
For security and compliance.
To prevent, detect, and investigate misrepresentations or fraud, cyber incidents, or other illegal activity.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account transactions.
For business analytics.
To use data analytics to improve the Program, Program Website, the Unity App, our products or services, our marketing activities, guest relationships, and Member experiences.
Your Account, and relevant information and transactions therein.
For migrating your existing loyalty data.
To migrate your existing loyalty data from pre-existing rewards or loyalty programs, including, without limitation, Seminole Wild Card, Hard Rock Rewards, Wild Card Rewards, and the Hard Rock Casino Northern Indiana Loyalty Program.
Name, address, and other contact details.
Account Credentials, including, where relevant, your Account PIN.
Approved Identification.
Account number(s) and/or other validating information.
Transactions and other relevant information from your pre-existing rewards or loyalty programs.
40. The legal bases for our processing activities include processing: (i) pursuant to your consent; (ii) as necessary to comply with our contractual obligations to you; (iii) as necessary to comply with our legal obligations; (iv) as necessary in order to protect your safety or other vital interest, or the safety or other vital interest of other persons; and (v) as necessary for the purposes of our legitimate business interests, or the legitimate business interests of a third party.
MARKETING COMMUNICATIONS AND YOUR COMMUNICATION PREFERENCES.
41. We may send you marketing communications relating to, or in connection with, the Program, including, but not limited to, about promotions, offers, contests, products or services (those that we offer now or plan to offer), and generally, anything that we believe may be of interest to you relating to, or in connection with, the Program.
42. You may define or update your communication preferences in terms of: (a) whether you wish to receive such marketing communications; and (b) if you receive such marketing communications, the manner in which those marketing communications are received by you from the options available in your online Account (e.g., by physical mail or email). You can select or update your communication preferences directly in your online Account (which can be accessed from the Program Website or through the Unity App) or you can contact Unity Customer Care by telephone at
+1 (888) 519-6683
or by email at
customer_care@hardrock.com
.
Promotional Offers.
43. We may use your Personal Information to form a view on what we think you may want or need, or what may be of interest to you. This is how we decide which products, services or offers may be relevant for you, and based on that, we may send you promotional offers (we call this marketing).
44. You may receive certain marketing communications from us if you have requested information from us, or purchased goods or services from us, and you have not opted out of receiving marketing communications or if you have expressly agreed to receive marketing communications. Hard Rock offers our customers mobile marketing messages. See terms of use for this service by clicking
here
.
Third-Party Marketing.
45. In order to provide you with the highest level of products and services, we may share your Personal Information with carefully selected third parties, who may communicate directly with you. In some jurisdictions, data privacy laws may require us to obtain a separate consent before we do so. You can always choose whether to receive any or all of these communications by contacting us as described in this Privacy Policy. Alternatively, you can express your preference by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link contained within any applicable marketing email sent to you.
Communication Preferences.
46. You can change your marketing communication preferences (including stopping marketing communications) at any time by: (a) logging into your online Account (using the Program Website or the Unity App) and selecting or unselecting the relevant boxes; or (b) contacting us. Alternatively, you can request that marketing emails are no longer sent to you by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link contained within any applicable marketing email sent to you.
47. Please note that if you have requested that that marketing communications are no longer sent to you, you will still continue to receive communications from us: (a) in connection with the operation of the Program and your Account, and any changes thereof; and (b) any transactional information (such as details of any products or services requested or obtained from us).
48. If you have given us your consent to provide your Personal Information to third parties for marketing purposes, you may withdraw your consent at any time by: (a) completing and submitting the online form
Exercising My Rights
; or (b) by calling our toll-free number at
1-833-970-1536
.
49. Hard Rock offers our customers mobile marketing messages. See terms of use for this service by clicking
here
.
WHO WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION WITH AND WHY.
50. We may share your Personal Information with certain third parties and for specific purposes. The table below describes the recipients to whom we may disclose your Personal Information and for which purpose.
Recipients
Purpose for sharing Personal Information
Hard Rock Affiliated Parties, Participating Locations, and Marketing Brands.
For any of the purposes described in the Section headed “
Purpose of Processing and Types of Personal Information Processed
” in this Privacy Policy,
Service providers (e.g., providers of customer relationship management services, marketing services, customer financial services, including, but not limited to, rewards, payments, deposits, credit, and funding, cloud services and information technology services).
To support the Program, offers, promotions, and event management.
To support data analysis, Program Website development, Unity App development, and digital and physical marketing services.
To support the storage of Program information, and the storage of Member personal and transactional information.
To support the earning of Tier Credits, and the earning and redemption of Unity Points.
To fund accounts for Gaming Play.
Professional service providers (e.g., accountants and lawyers)
Where necessary to provide their professional services in the support of our business functions, any reviews, advice, compliance with the Program, or to protect our interests.
51. All the above categories exclude text messaging originator opt-in data and consent; this information will not be shared with any third parties.
52. We may disclose your Personal Information to third parties if necessary or appropriate: (a) to comply with Applicable Laws, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including authorities outside your country of residence and to meet national security or law enforcement requirements; (d) to enforce the Membership Terms; (e) to protect our operations, such as in the event of any reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets or stock; (f) to protect the rights, privacy, safety or property of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties, you or others; (g) to protect any tangible or intangible property of the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties; (h) to allow us to pursue available remedies to protect our interests or those of our Members; and (i) to prevent or limit any damages that we may otherwise sustain.
53. We may also share your Personal Information with third parties to whom we may choose to sell, transfer or merge parts of our business or our assets. Alternatively, we may seek to acquire other businesses or merge with them. If a change happens to our business, then the new owners may use your Personal Information in the same way as set out in this Privacy Policy.
54. We may sell your Personal Information to third parties with whom we may partner in order: (a) to provide you with a better guest experience; or (b) for you to receive offers from those third parties that we believe may be of value to you. As of the effective date of this Privacy Policy, we have not sold any of your Personal Information.
HOW LONG DO WE KEEP YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION FOR?
55. We will only retain your Personal Information for as long as reasonably necessary for the purposes for which we collected the Personal Information, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, tax, accounting, or reporting requirements. We may retain your Personal Information for a longer period in the event of a complaint or if we reasonably believe there is a prospect of litigation in respect to our relationship with you.
56. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Information, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the Personal Information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Information, the purposes for which we Process your Personal Information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal, regulatory, tax, accounting, or other requirements. Notwithstanding, as a general policy, we do not retain Personal Information for longer than seven (7) years.
57. In some circumstances we will anonymise your Personal Information (so that it can no longer be associated with you) for historical research or statistical purposes, in which case we may use this information indefinitely without further notice to you.
58. When we no longer need to Process or retain your Personal Information, records, both physical and electronic, will be destroyed.
INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION.
59. As a global organization, we may internationally transfer your Personal Information we collect between the Hard Rock Affiliated Parties (including Hard Rock’s headquarters in the United States), Participating Locations, service providers, and third-party partners.
60. We may store and/or Process your Personal Information in the United States, or in Canada, or in other jurisdictions.
61. Some of the jurisdictions to which Personal Information is transferred may not provide the same level of privacy protection as your local jurisdiction. However, whenever we transfer your Personal Information outside of the European Economic Area (the “
EEA
”) or the United Kingdom (UK), we rely on the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (DPF) and the UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as described in the following section and, in the event of its future invalidation, we implement adequate safeguards in accordance with Applicable Laws in order to ensure a similar degree of protection as the country of origin.
EU-U.S. DATA PRIVACY FRAMEWORK (DPF) AND THE UK EXTENSION TO THE EU-U.S. DPF COMPLIANCE
62. Hard Rock participates in and complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), and the UK Extension of the EU-U.S. DPF as approved by the European Commission in its adequacy decision issued on July 10, 2023. Hard Rock complies with the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension DPF Principles, that were developed by the U.S. Department of Commerce in consultation with the European Commission in order to provide organizations in the United States with a reliable mechanism for personal information transfers to the United States from the EU and UK while ensuring that EU data subjects and UK data subjects continue to benefit from effective safeguards and protection as required by European legislation with respect to the processing of their personal information when they have been transferred to non-EU countries.
63. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension DPF Principles, the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension DPF Principles shall govern.
64. To learn more about the EU-U.S DPF and UK Extension DPF and view our certification, please visit the DPF website at
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search
.
65. Hard Rock commits to cooperate with the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) comply with the advice given by such authorities with regard to human resources data transferred from the EU and UK in the context of the employment relationship.
66. Hard Rock and the following U.S. subsidiaries comply with the EU-U.S. and UK Extension DPF Principles:
Boardwalk 1000, LLC
Hard Rock Cafe International (STP), Inc.
Hard Rock Cafe International (Hollywood), Inc.
Hard Rock Cafe International (Orlando), Inc.
Hard Rock Cafe Merchandise, Inc.
Hard Rock Casino Cincinnati, LLC
Hard Rock Hotel Licensing, Inc.
Seminole Hard Rock Support Services, LLC
Hard Rock Sacramento FM, LLC
Seminole Hard Rock Digital, LLC
Seminole Hard Rock Entertainment, Inc.
Spectacle Gary Holding, LLC
67. In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Hard Rock commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your Personal Information.
68. If you have any question or complaint regarding our participation in the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension of the EU-U.S. DPF or the processing of your Personal Information you may contact us as indicated below in the section of this Privacy Policy “HOW TO CONTACT US”.
DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ARBITRATION
69. When other dispute resolution avenues are exhausted, you may invoke the binding arbitration. Hard Rock Cafe International (USA), Inc. has provided a private sector independent recourse mechanism (located in the United States) to investigate and expeditiously resolve individual complaints and disputes. This dispute mechanism will cover all Personal Information except for human resource data. For more information, visit the website for ICDR®/AAA®EU-U.S. DPF: International Centre for Dispute Resolution®, the international division of the American Arbitration Association® (ICDR/AAA) at
https://www.icdr.org/dpf
. The services of ICDR/AAA are provided at no cost to you.
70. Under certain limited conditions and as a last resort, the individual can invoke binding arbitration. The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Hard Rock’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF.
71. If Hard Rock transfers your Personal Information to a third party, we will ensure the third party is contractually obligated to process your Personal Information only for limited, specific purposes consistent with this policy, to apply the same level of protection to that data as the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and notify us if it makes a determination that it can no longer meet this obligation. Upon notice, Hard Rock will take reasonable and appropriate steps to stop and remediate unauthorized processing. In cases of onward transfer to third parties of Personal Information received pursuant to the EU-U.S. DPF, Hard Rock is potentially liable.
YOUR RIGHTS.
Overview.
72. Under applicable data protection laws, you have a number of rights in relation to the Personal Information that we hold about you. These rights might not apply in every circumstance. You can exercise your rights by contacting us at any time using the details set out in this Privacy Policy (see the Section headed, “
Our Contact Details
”).
73. The table in this Section sets out the rights that you have over your Personal Information. Please note that although we take your rights seriously, there may be some circumstances where we cannot comply with your request. For example, if complying with your request would put us in a position of non-compliance with our own legal or regulatory requirements. In these instances, we will let you know why we cannot satisfy your request.
YOUR RIGHTS
DESCRIPTION
Right of Access
This is commonly known as a “data subject access request”.  It entitles you to inquire whether we are processing your Personal Information, what type of Personal Information, how we process it, and also to receive a copy of the Personal Information we hold about you.
Right to Rectification
This right entitles you to request us to correct any incomplete or inaccurate Personal Information we may hold about you.
We always take care to ensure that the information we hold about you is accurate and where necessary, up to date. As part of the Membership Terms, you are required to provide complete and accurate information in connection with your enrolment and participation in the Program, and to update that information promptly if there are any changes or if it becomes inaccurate.
If you believe that there are any inaccuracies, discrepancies, or gaps in the information we hold about you, you may change your personal details anytime in your account profile on the Program Website or Unity App, or by contacting Unity Customer Care by telephone at
+1 (888) 519-6683
or by email at
customer_care@hardrock.com
.
Note that we may need to verify the accuracy of any new data you provide to us. As such, we may require you to send supporting documentation prior to allowing certain changes (e.g., any changes to your legal name).
Right to Erasure or Right to be Forgotten
This right entitles you, in certain circumstances, to ask us to delete or remove your Personal Information.  These circumstances include, for example:
where we no longer need your Personal Information for the original purpose we collected it for;
where you have exercised your right to withdraw consent;
where you have successfully exercised your Right to Object to processing; or
where we may have processed your information unlawfully or where we are required to erase your Personal Information to comply with local law.
Note, however, that we may not always be able to comply with your request of erasure.  While we will assess every request, there are other factors that we will need to take into consideration.  For example, we may be unable to erase your information if retention of your Personal Information is reasonably necessary to:
meet our legal obligations;
resolve disputes;
maintain security;
prevent fraud and abuse; or
enforce the Membership Terms.
We may also need to retain your Personal Information if required by gaming industry regulations, tax statutes, and other legal requirements (e.g., information on our guests who self-report; tax reporting documents; player winnings, and any statistics, reports or listings that are required to comply with Applicable Laws or protect Participating Locations).
Right to Restriction
This right entitles you to ask us to suspend the processing of your Personal Information in certain scenarios including the following:
if you want us to establish the accuracy of your Personal Information;
where our use of your Personal Information is unlawful, but you do not want us to erase it;
where you need us to hold the Personal Information even if we no longer require it as you need it to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or
where you have objected to our use of your Personal Information, but we need to verify whether we have overriding legitimate grounds to use it.
Right to Data Portability
This right entitles you to request the transfer of your Personal Information to you or to a third party in certain circumstances.
We will provide to you, or a third party you have chosen, your Personal Information in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format.  Note that this right only applies to processing carried out by automated means which you initially provided consent for us to use, or where we used the information to perform a contract with you.
Right to Object
This right entitles you to object to our processing of your Personal Information in certain circumstances.
In some cases, we may refuse your request to object to our processing of your Personal Information, for instance, when we have compelling legitimate grounds to process your Personal Information which outweighs any prejudice to your rights and freedoms.
With respect to direct marketing, you have certain controls over the extent to which we market to you, and you have the right to request that we stop sending you certain marketing messages at any time.  For information about how to let us know you do not want to receive certain marketing messages, see the Section entitled, “
Marketing Communications And Your Communication Preferences
”.
Please note that even if you exercise this right because you do not want to receive certain marketing messages, we may still send you Program, Account, and transactional related communications where necessary.
Right not to be subject to a decision based solely on Automated Decision-Making, including Profiling
We may use your Personal Information and share it with advertisers and advertising networks, analytics and search engine providers, social networking companies (i.e., Facebook), and rewards companies for the purpose of “profiling”, which includes evaluating your personal aspects to analyze or predict aspects concerning your economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behaviour, location, or movements and segmenting you into a group with other Members or other persons who have similar personal characteristics.  We may use this profiling to make automated decisions, meaning without human interference, to improve the efficiency of our marketing and to offer certain benefits to you or other persons based on this profiling.  You have the right to opt-out at any time of our sharing of your Personal Information in this way.
In addition, we may also use your Personal Information to generate a “lookalike audience” or similar audience of prospective customers through the platforms of advertisers and advertising networks, analytics and search engine providers, social networking companies (e.g., Facebook) and rewards companies.  This allows us to target advertisements to potential customers who appear to have shared interests or similar demographics to you (based on the platform’s own data).  By way of example, we do this by uploading a data list to Facebook that is encrypted and anonymized (i.e., you cannot be individually identified on the data list).  Facebook then matches the encrypted and anonymized data list against Facebook’s own customer base to generate the lookalike audience.  Facebook then deletes the data list we provided to them, and uses it for no other purpose. We do not have access to the identity of anybody in the lookalike audience generated from Facebook’s own customer base, unless they choose to click on the ads for our products and services.
74. You can exercise your rights described in this Privacy Policy by contacting us using the contact details set out in the Section entitled, “How to Contact Us”. As a security measure, we may need to verify your identity when we receive your request, and we may need you to provide valid proof of identification. In addition, we may also contact you to ask for more information about your request to help us with our response.
75. Note that if you exercise your rights over your Personal Information and have more than one account with us, you will need to instruct us on each account separately.
No Fee Usually Required.
76. You will not have to pay a fee to access your Personal Information (or to exercise any of your rights described in this Section). However, we may charge a reasonable fee if we, in our sole discretion, consider your request is unfounded, repetitive, or excessive. Alternatively, we may refuse to comply with your request.
Response Time.
77. We try to respond to all legitimate requests based on your rights described in this Privacy Policy within one (1) month. Occasionally it could take us longer than one (1) month if your request is particularly complex or you have made a number of requests. In this case, we will notify you and keep you updated.
THIRD-PARTY LINKS.
78. The Program Website and the Unity App may contain links to third-party websites, plug-ins, and applications (“
Third-Party Platforms
”) whose privacy policies may differ from ours.
79. Clicking on those links may allow third parties to collect or share Personal Information about you. If you leave the Program Website or Unity App, we encourage you to carefully read and understand the privacy policies issued by these Third-Party Platforms.
80. Please note that we do not control these Third-Party Platforms and are not responsible for their privacy policies, statements, and practices (even if you access such platforms using links from the Program Website or Unity App). We do not accept any responsibility or liability in respect of these Third-Party Platforms.
HOW WE KEEP YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION SECURE.
81. We use industry standard security safeguards to help protect Personal Information from unauthorized access, alteration, or disclosure. In addition, we limit access to your Personal Information to those employees, agents, contractors, service providers, and other third parties who have a business need to know. They will only Process your Personal Information on our instructions, and they are subject to a duty of confidentiality. Despite these efforts, please understand that as no system is perfect, we cannot guarantee that unauthorized access or theft of data will not occur, so you should exercise caution when transferring personal and other sensitive information over the Internet.
82. Please advise us immediately at
dataprotection@hardrock.com
of any incident involving the loss of or unauthorized access to or disclosure of Personal Information that is in our custody or control. We maintain Incident Response and Business Continuity Plans to address data incident situations.
83. You are responsible for keeping your Account Credentials confidential. You should not share such Account Credentials with any other person, as you are responsible for all activity on your Account. Be sure to sign off when finished if you are using a shared device. You must notify us immediately if you are aware or suspect any unauthorized use of your Account. Please note that we will never ask for a password other than on the log-in page on your Unity online account (which is accessible through the Program Website or the Unity App). Links are available on the Program Website and the Unity App to request assistance for logging into your online Account.
PROTECTING CHILDREN.
84. We are mindful of the privacy of children as they may be less aware of the risks, consequences and safeguards concerned, and their rights in relation to the processing of Personal Information. For these reasons, promotions, and activities by us addressed to children always receive specific attention and protection. We always rely on consent as a lawful basis for processing of Personal Information relating to children, and we always get consent from whoever holds custodial responsibility for the child.
UPDATES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY.
85. We reserve the right to update, change, revise, modify, amend, supplement, or replace this Privacy Policy (collectively, the “
Changes
”) at any time in our sole discretion by providing notice of the Changes by posting the revised Privacy Policy (incorporating the Changes) to the Program Website. In addition, we, in our sole discretion (unless required by Applicable Laws), may provide notice of the Changes by sending a copy of the revised Privacy Policy via email to Members. If you continue to access or use the Program Website or the Unity App, or continue to participate in the Program, after the revised Privacy Policy has been posted, or after receiving a copy of the revised Privacy Policy (incorporating the Changes) by email (if we choose to send you an email); then subject to Applicable Laws, you will be deemed to have accepted such Changes and the revised Privacy Policy shall become binding upon you as of the date that the revised Privacy Policy became effective. We therefore encourage you to review our Privacy Policy periodically for the most up-to-date information.
86. If you disagree with the revised Privacy Policy, then your sole and exclusive remedy is to withdraw from the Program and terminate your Membership in accordance with the Membership Terms.
U.S. STATE-SPECIFIC PRIVACY LAWS.
87. If you reside in U.S. States with comprehensive data privacy laws, then, in addition to the rights you have under this Privacy Policy, you are entitled to the additional disclosures and rights set out in the U.S State-Specific Privacy Laws depending on the particular State in which you reside. Please click this link
U.S. State-Specific Privacy Laws
to see the additional disclosures and rights that apply to you. Please check the above link regularly for any updates that may apply to you or your place of residence.
HOW TO CONTACT US.
88.
Global Data Protection & Risk Office.
Our Global Data Protection & Risk Office is responsible for overseeing this Privacy Policy.  If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, or you wish to exercise any of your rights set out in the Section entitled “
Your Rights
” of this Privacy Policy, please: (1) contact our Global Data Protection & Risk Office by using the contact details below, or
(2) complete and submit the online form which can be accessed at the link below.
To:
Global Data Protection & Risk Office
Seminole Hard Rock Support Services, LLC d/b/a Unity Global Services
Postal address:
5701 Stirling Road,
Davie, Florida 33314
United States of America
Email address:
dataprotection@hardrock.com
Telephone number:
+1-833-970-1536
(U.S. toll-free); or
+1-954-498-9834
Website:
unity.hardrock.com
Online Form Link:
You can exercise any of your rights by submitting the online form
Exercising My Rights
89. Please include your first name, last name, address, phone number, email address, and any relevant account or reference number in all communications and state clearly the nature of your request or concern. If you wish to exercise your privacy rights mentioned in the Section entitled “Your Rights” of this Privacy Policy, please mention the name of the right you would like to exercise in the subject of your request. As a security measure, we may need to verify your identity when we receive your request, and we may need you to provide valid proof of identification. If we decline to take action regarding your request, we shall inform you of the justification for declining to take action and shall provide you with instructions on how to appeal our decision (you can appeal our decision by following those instructions).
90.
UK Contact Information.
For residents in the UK, please contact our UK Data Privacy Representative by using the following contact details:
To:
UK Unity Data Privacy
Postal address:
148 Old Park Lane,
London W1K IQY
United Kingdom
Email address:
dataprotection@hardrock.com
Telephone number:
+
44-020-7514-1700
91. You have the right to make a complaint at any time to the Information Commissioner’s Office (“
ICO
”), the UK regulator for data protection issues (
www.ico.org.uk
). We would, however, appreciate the chance to deal with your concerns before you approach the ICO, so we ask that you please contact us in the first instance.
92.
EEA Contact Information.
For residents of the EEA, please contact our EEA Data Privacy Representative by using the following contact details:
To:
EEA Unity Data Privacy
Studio Legale PANETTA
Postal address:
Via Arenula, 83
00186 Roma RM, Italy
Email address:
dataprotection@hardrock.co.it
Telephone number:
+
39-06-6821-0129
93. You have the right to make a complaint at any time with a supervisory authority based in the EEA; in particular, a supervisory authority in the EEA country of your habitual residence, place of work, or of an alleged infringement of data protection laws.
94. In all cases, we will do our best to answer any question and resolve any complaint to your satisfaction.
Appendix 1 (China)
This Appendix contains additional privacy provisions that, in addition to the Privacy Policy, apply within the borders of People’s Republic of China (PRC), excluding Hong Kong Special Administrative Region, Macau Special Administrative Region and Taiwan.
Mini-program
.  This Appendix to the Privacy Policy explains how we, the Program Website, and/or our WeChat Mini program (the "
Mini-program
") collect and otherwise process Personal Information. You may choose to submit Personal Information (such as your name, IDENTIFICATION CARD NUMBER, ADDRESS, e-mail address, birthdate, and telephone number) to us at a Participating Location, through the Program Website, or the Mini-program. We collect, store, use, process, transfer, provide, delete, or otherwise process Personal Information for providing services to you regarding the Program and other business purposes set out in the Privacy Policy only unless otherwise permitted by Applicable Laws. We will not share this information in ways different from what is disclosed in the Privacy Policy. If you have any questions about this Appendix, the Privacy Policy, the Website, or the Mini-program, please contact us at
dataprotection@hardrock.com
Personal Information Rights
.
Change or Correct
:  You can request that we change or correct your Personal Information. Among others, if you created an account with us, you can review and edit your Personal Information by logging onto the Website or the Mini-program and visiting your account. Please note that personal profile information supplied by you on the Website or the Mini-program can be accessed by you online at any time and no charge.
Withdrawing Consent
.  If we have collected or processed your Personal Information with your consent, you may withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect the processing of your Personal Information based on other lawful processing grounds.
Explanation
. You can request us to explain our Personal Information processing rules.
Access, correction, amendment, deletion.
If you request access, correction, amendment, or deletion of your Personal Information and you have more than one account with us, you will need to instruct us on each account separately. Reasonable access to Personal Information will generally be provided within thirty (30) calendar days at no cost to you, subject to limited exceptions prescribed by Applicable Laws or excessive requests.
Please note that we may need to retain certain Personal Information for recordkeeping purposes or to complete transactions that occurred prior to your request. We will also retain your Personal Information if reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations, meet regulatory requirements, resolve disputes, maintain security, prevent fraud and abuse, to the extent permissible by Applicable Laws.
Right not to provide information
.
You have the right not to provide Personal Information. However, if you elect not to provide the necessary Personal Information as described above, you may not be able to utilize some or all of the Program services.
Sensitive Information
.
THE PPERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT AND PROCESS MAY CONTAIN SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION. THE INFORMATION WE COLLECT AND WHICH MIGHT BE DEEMED AS SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION IS IN UPPERCASE IN THE PRIVACY POLICY FOR YOUR SPECIAL ATTENTION, INCLUDING YOUR IDENTIFICATION CARD NUMBER, ADDRESSES, PAYMENT INFORMATION, GEOLOCATION, THE PERSONAL INFORMATION OF YOUR CHILDREN UNDER 14 YEARS OLD, ETC. In each case, we will make sure that the processing of your sensitive Personal Information is for specific purposes as described in the Privacy Policy and is necessary; we will take strict security measures when processing the sensitive Personal Information and such processing will be conducted in a manner having the least impact on your personal rights and interests.
YOU EXPRESSLY AND VOLUNTARILY CONSENT TO THE PROCESSING BY US OF YOUR SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION FOR THE PURPOSES AND IN THE MANNER DESCRIBED IN THE PRIVACY POLICY.
Data Sharing and Transfers
.
In addition, to the extent permissible under Applicable Laws of China, we may share your Personal Information to local, state, federal, and foreign countries as mandated by their reporting requirements; and governmental authorities to comply with legal, regulatory, or administrative requirements, or as otherwise required by the U.S. or other law. In such case, we will notify you of the name and contact information of the foreign recipients, their information processing purposes and methods and the types of Personal Information processed by them and other information, to the extent required under applicable law. We may also disclose your Personal Information where necessary to prevent actual or suspected loss or harm to persons or property, or as otherwise permitted by law.
Cookies are small files stored on your browser. We use cookies to analyze and enhance the usage of our website (“Performance Cookies”) or to provide you with customized content based on the preference you saved on our website (“Functional Cookies”) and we may share data with our advertising partners to build profiles about you to show you relevant ads (“Targeting Cookies”). Click on “Cookies Settings” to set your preferences.
Privacy Policy
Cookies Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are set by a range of social media services that we have added to the site to enable you to share our content with your friends and networks. They are capable of tracking your browser across other sites and building up a profile of your interests. This may impact the content and messages you see on other websites you visit.    If you do not allow these cookies you may not be able to use or see these sharing tools.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label